http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_us/iran_terrorism_lawsuit Court upholds &#36;2.8M Iran terrorism claim of the Web Court upholds &#36;2.8M Iran terrorism claim PM ET SAN FRANCISCO - The brother of an Iranian terrorism victim can collect $2.8 million from a California company that owes for a canceled weapons shipment, a federal appeals court ruled Wednesday. Dariush Elahi's brother, Cyrus, was a leader in a France-based Iranian opposition movement and was assassinated in Paris in 1990. French authorities blamed the Iranian government for the killing. In 2000, Dariush Elahi sued Iran in federal court in Washington. The Iranian government failed to respond to the lawsuit and, after a trial, a judge awarded Elahi $11.7 million in compensatory and $300 million in punitive damages. When Dariush Elahi accepted $2.3 million from the U.S. government under a law that allows terrorism victims to collect damages from the U.S. Treasury, lawyers for the Bush administration and the Iranian government said he relinquished his claim to the rest of the original judgment. But a divided three-judge panel 9th U.S. Circuit Court of Appeals said that he is entitled to the $2.8 million that Cubic Defense Systems Inc. owes Iran after pulling out of a weapons contract immediately following the Shah of Iran's fall in 1979. "Obviously we are very pleased the court affirmed the validity of the lien," said Jonathan Mook, an attorney for Dariush Elahi. David Bederman, who represents Iran in the case, said Wednesday that he would ask a 15-judge panel of the appeals court to overturn the decision. TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology - 20 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 42 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070529/ap_on_re_us/terrorism_extradition Terrorism suspect: Charges unfounded of the Web Terrorism suspect: Charges unfounded By LARRY NEUMEISTER, Associated Press Writer Tue May 29, 4:40 An American student extradited from London on charges that he provided al-Qaida fighters with equipment to attack U.S. soldiers is an activist, not a terrorist, his lawyer said Tuesday after the man pleaded not guilty. "These charges are unfounded," the lawyer, Sean Maher, told reporters. Syed Hashmi, a 27-year-old former New York resident, was the first terrorism suspect extradited to the United States by British authorities. He arrived shortly before midnight Friday to face a May 2006 indictment. On Tuesday, Hashmi smiled at a dozen family members and friends as he was led out of the courtroom. He will be detained pending a bail hearing scheduled for Friday. "He is not a terrorist. He is an academic. He's been a political activist," his lawyer said. Hashmi attended Brooklyn College and London Metropolitan University, and was studying political science and getting a master's degree in international relations, Maher said. Hashmi has been outspoken at rallies, mostly in the United States, about his views opposing some U.S. policies, though he would not be more specific, the lawyer said. Maher said his client will prove that having "a political opinion contrary to the government doesn't mean you intend to commit a crime." Prosecutors accuse Hashmi, who was born in Pakistan and is also known as "Fahad," of supplying unspecified equipment for al-Qaida "to fight against United States forces in Maher said he had not seen the government's evidence but believed the equipment was "glorified camping equipment" including sleeping bags and goggles. Before Hashmi was arrested June 6 as he boarded a flight to Pakistan at Heathrow Airport, he had lived in Britain for three years. He opposed extradition, but the British High Court ruled against him in March. If convicted, he could face up to 50 years in prison. Among charges in the three-count indictment was the top count of conspiring to contribute funds, goods or services to the terrorist group. Law enforcement officials have said Hashmi was associated with another Queens man, Mohammed Junaid Babar, who pleaded guilty in August 2004 to smuggling night-vision goggles, money and military supplies to an al-Qaida official establishing a "jihad training camp" in Pakistan. The Hashmi indictment mentioned the prior arrest of an unidentified co-conspirator, which Maher said he believed referred to Babar. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government Reuters, AM ET New agency IARPA develops spy tools AP, AM ET UK fertiliser bomb plot at BBC, Apr 30 Terror Database Has Quadrupled In Four Years Increase in anti-terror targets In First for Britain, U.S. Citizen Is Extradited on Terror Charges at The New York Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles When Terrorists Become 'Warriors' TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Marine vet faces hearing over protest - 20 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 42 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. & Osama bin Laden Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_au_an/australia_terror_plot 9 terror suspects plead not guilty terror suspects plead not guilty AM ET SYDNEY, Australia - Nine men accused of stockpiling bomb-making chemicals and plotting to avenge perceived injustices against Muslims pleaded not guilty to all charges Thursday in Australia's largest alleged terrorist conspiracy. The men, all Muslims, are charged with conspiring between June 2004 and November 2005 to carry out an attack with bombs or other weaponry to advance a "political, religious or ideological cause." If convicted, they face a maximum penalty of life in prison. Their lawyers have steadfastly maintained their clients' innocence, saying the chemicals found at their homes were for ordinary household or industrial uses. At a pretrial hearing earlier this year, prosecutors claimed the nine suspects bought unrestricted chemicals that can be used in making explosives, and downloaded instructions from the Internet that included how to mix the cocktail of agents used to make the bombs used in the deadly 2005 London subway attacks. Prosecutors allege the men were devotees of a radical Muslim cleric sympathetic to , and struck a pact to launch a terrorist attack because they felt their religion was under attack. No planned target has been revealed, but police alleged the suspects had Australia's only nuclear reactor &#151; a small facility used to make radioactive medical supplies &#151; under surveillance. The men were arrested in 2005 in a series of pre-dawn raids in Sydney and the southern city of Melbourne, where cleric Abdul Nacer Benbrika and other followers also were detained and now face separate charges of belonging to a terrorist group. Authorities said police found transcripts of bin Laden speeches and other al-Qaida material, as well as videos of people being beheaded, in some of the suspects' homes. The nine suspects are Mohammed Ali Elomar, Mazen Touma, Abdul Rakib Hasan, Khaled Cheikho, Moustafa Cheikho, Khaled Sharrouf, Mirsad Mulahalilovic, Omar Baladjam and Mohammed Jamal. Judge Anthony Whealy said the trial should start next February. U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 59 minutes ago minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_re_mi_ea/lebanon_violence 20 suspects charged in Lebanon fighting suspects charged in Lebanon fighting By BASSEM MROUE, Associated Press Writer PM ET BEIRUT, Lebanon - A military judge filed terrorism charges Wednesday against 20 suspected members of an Islamic militant group fighting Lebanese troops at a Palestinian refugee camp, court officials said. In Berlin, Russian Foreign Minister Sergey Lavrov suggested the U.S. was destabilizing the situation in Lebanon by shipping weapons to the army for its fight against the militants &#151; drawing a pointed rebuke from Secretary of State The Lebanese military has been fighting Islam militants at the Nahr el-Bared refugee camp in northern Lebanon since May 20. The camp is ringed by hundreds of soldiers backed by artillery and tanks in place to storm the camp. Fatah Islam has claimed to have more than 500 fighters with automatic weapons, mortars and rocket-propelled grenades inside the camp. The Lebanese government has vowed to crush the militants. Fighting between the army and militants resumed shortly after sunset Wednesday at the camp on the outskirts of the port city of Tripoli. Army artillery blasted militant positions inside the camp to silence the source of fire. There was no immediate word on casualties. Several Fatah Islam suspects have been arrested in army raids on apartments in Tripoli in the past two weeks. It was not clear where the 20 militants were arrested. The 20 included 18 Lebanese, a nonnative Lebanese and a Syrian. All were charged with committing terrorist acts that resulted in the deaths of soldiers and civilians, the officials said. The charges against them also include forming a gang with the aim of committing crimes against the people and undermining state authority. All 20 are in custody and if convicted, they could face the death penalty. Sporadic gunfire exchanges have continued daily since a truce halted three days of heavy fighting. But renewed fighting that began before sundown Tuesday was the worst outbreak in violence in a week. Lebanese army artillery pounded positions on the northern edge of the camp and near the Mediterranean coastline, apparently to prevent militants from fleeing. Since the fighting began, 31 soldiers, 20 civilians and about 60 militants have been killed. Thousands of Palestinians have fled the camp but thousands more are still inside, along with hundreds of fighters. The standoff has raised concerns of more violence across Lebanon, which has 12 Palestinian refugee camps and various armed groups. The U.S. has airlifted planeloads of military supplies to Beirut to support the Lebanese troops in their battle with the militants. Lavrov, speaking at a news conference of the Quartet of Middle East peace negotiators in Berlin, was asked about the shipments and responded with a remark about "the necessity of avoiding weapons supplies that could destabilize the situation." Rice, sitting just to his right at the German Foreign Ministry, responded quickly that the U.S. was attempting to help rebuild the Lebanese army so it can defend the country against armed groups. "The rebuilding of the Lebanese army is envisioned in any number of international agreements ... and that is what we are doing," Rice said. "We are supporting the Lebanese army, which is an all-Lebanese institution. It's not a matter of interfering in Lebanese affairs, it's an effort to help Lebanon to defend its own sovereignty." U.S. arms are a sensitive issue in a nation deeply divided between supporters of Prime Minister Fuad Saniora's government and an opposition backed by America's Mideast foes, . The opposition led by the Shiite Islamic militant group Hezbollah accuses Saniora of being too close to Washington. 42 minutes ago Syria may trouble Lebanon after U.N. vote: Hariri Reuters, 50 minutes ago 'We have no rights and no future' at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 The cauldron may bubble over again at The Economist, May 29 Syria condemns Lebanon tribunal U.N. Council Backs Tribunal For Lebanon The question: Why is Lebanon so unstable? at The Guardian (UK)., May 24 at The Guardian (UK)., May 24 U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 59 minutes ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. woman who fled the Palestinian refugee camp of Nahr el-Bared attends her sick son... East News - AP elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070530/wl_nm/lebanon_fighting_dc Lebanon charges 20 jihadists with terrorism charges 20 jihadists with terrorism AM ET NAHR AL-BARED, Lebanon (Reuters) - Lebanon charged 20 members of al-Islam with terrorism on Wednesday and Lebanese troops battled jihadists from the militant group at a Palestinian refugee camp in the north for an 11th day. Judiciary sources said the charges against the 19 Lebanese and one Syrian, all in custody, carried the death penalty and were linked to fighting around the Nahr al-Bared camp that has killed 79 people -- 34 soldiers, 27 militants and 18 civilians. The Lebanese authorities blame the group for starting the confrontations by attacking army positions at the camp and near the northern city of Tripoli on May 20. The fighting, the worst in Lebanon since the 1975-1990 civil war, has continued sporadically. The combatants exchanged artillery shells and mortar bombs for hours overnight in the heaviest fighting in a week, witnesses said. But the clashes tapered off in the early hours of Wednesday. The Lebanese government has demanded the militants surrender. Fatah al-Islam say they have been acting in self defense and reject the demand to hand over any of their fighters. A 1969 Arab agreement stops the army from entering Lebanon&#39;s 12 Palestinian refugee camps, home to 400,000. The government has given Palestinian leaders in Lebanon a chance to find a way out of the stand-off, as it is concerned that the refugees will see more army action at the camp as an attack on their community. More than 25,000 of the camp&#39;s 40,000 Palestinians have fled from the fighting. Most of the displaced refugees have flooded the nearby Beddawi camp, where humanitarian organizations have been carrying out relief work. More food supplies, medicine and water were sent to Nahr al-Bared, whose remaining inhabitants have no electricity or running water, witnesses said. The prospect of a decisive military solution to the stand-off has been played down by the government in recent days because it could trigger violence at other refugee camps, even though Fatah al-Islam has little support among Palestinians. Members of Lebanon&#39;s anti-Syrian cabinet have described Fatah al-Islam as a tool of Syrian intelligence, although Damascus denies any links to the group. Lebanese authorities say Fatah al-Islam includes Arabs from Saudi Arabia, Algeria, Tunisia, 40 minutes ago Syria may trouble Lebanon after U.N. vote: Hariri Reuters, 48 minutes ago 'We have no rights and no future' at The Guardian (UK)., May 30 The cauldron may bubble over again at The Economist, May 29 Syria condemns Lebanon tribunal U.N. Council Backs Tribunal For Lebanon The question: Why is Lebanon so unstable? at The Guardian (UK)., May 24 at The Guardian (UK)., May 24 U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty AP - 59 minutes ago minutes ago Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. A boy sits on top of a monument at dawn in the coastal city of... elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/cq/20070529/pl_cq_politics/yarmuthsjobsecuritygetstestfromkentuckysexhomelandsecuritychief Yarmuth’s Job Security Gets Test From Kentucky’s Ex-Homeland Security Chief Job Security Gets Test From Kentucky’s Ex-Homeland Security Chief Tue May 29, 8:00 AM ET Political campaigning rarely takes time off in Kentucky, which holds its elections for governor in odd-numbered years. And most of the attention in Kentucky politics currently is focused on the battle between incumbent Republican Gov. Ernie Fletcher and Democrat Steve Beshear, a former lieutenant governor, that was set up by their victories in the May 22 primary. Yet even as Fletcher and Beshear gear up for their general election campaigns, some candidates are preparing for next year’s congressional elections in Kentucky. One of the latest of these is Republican lawyer Erwin Roberts, who is vying to challenge freshman Democratic Rep. John A. Yarmuth in the Louisville-centered 3rd District. Last Wednesday — a day after the gubernatorial primary — Roberts filed paperwork with the (FEC) to formally organize his campaign against Yarmuth, who last year ousted five-term Republican Rep. Anne M. Northup. Northup sought a comeback by challenging Fletcher in the recent GOP primary for governor, but was defeated. Roberts is a former federal prosecutor with a background in homeland security. He joined Fletcher’s administration in March 2004 as Kentucky’s first homeland security director, and later served as Fletcher’s Secretary of the Personnel Cabinet. He left in June 2006 and is now counsel to the Louisville law firm of Frost Brown Todd. Earlier this year, Roberts endorsed Northup for governor over Fletcher, who has poor approval ratings in part because of a merit-hiring scandal. The Kentucky 3rd District contest also is notable in that Roberts, who is African-American, is seeking a seat in a chamber that presently has no black Republicans. Ken Spain, a spokesman for the National Republican Congressional Committee (NRCC), praised Roberts as “an incredibly talented individual.” “We’re extremely excited about his candidacy,” Spain said of Roberts, who recently attended the NRCC’s candidate training school in Washington. Yarmuth has been a Democratic loyalist during his brief tenure, according to an analysis of his House votes. Of the votes this year that pitted most Democrats against most Republicans, Yarmuth voted the majority Democratic position 96.8 percent of the time — a very high “party unity” score. A vigorous opponent of the war, Yarmuth was among the 169 Democrats who voted earlier this month for a bill, rejected by the House, to require the withdrawal of U.S. troops from Iraq within 90 days and complete it within 180 days. Republicans have contended that Yarmuth is vulnerable for next year’s race in the 3rd District, where any Democratic lean is narrow: Democratic challenger there in 2004 by just 2 percentage points. But Yarmuth, a longtime alternative newspaper publisher, surprised skeptics in 2006: He overcame Northup with an aggressive campaign that tied the Republican incumbent to Bush, whose popularity had dropped sharply in the two years since his re-election. And Yarmuth — whose campaign spending in the 2006 campaign exceeded $2.2 million — has been just as aggressive with his early fundraising for next year’s race. He reported raising $303,000 in the first three months of this year, which ranked him 40th out of the 435 House members who were elected in 2006. He had $293,000 in cash on hand as April began. Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Boost biofuels, cut U.S. farm aid: ex-Senate leaders Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET with Bad Credit refinance requests only. CQ's Election Forecaster Map Subscribe to CQPolitics E-Mail RSS Feeds From CQPolitics - Congressional Quarterly urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070528/ap_on_go_ot/immigration_terrorism Study: Terror deportations remain stable Terror deportations remain stable By MICHAEL J. SNIFFEN, Associated Press Writer Mon May 28, 7:21 PM ET WASHINGTON - U.S. immigration agencies say anti-terrorism is their primary mission, but they tried to deport only 12 people on terrorism-related charges from 2004 through 2006, according to a private research study released Sunday. That group of 12 represents a tiny fraction of the 814,073 people the government tried to remove from the country during those three years. The study's authors acknowledge the figure understates the anti-terrorism effort by the In addition, because no one knows how many terrorists are in the United States or tried to get in, there is no way to say whether the figure of 12 is too low, too high or about right. "The right number is unknowable," co-author David Burnham said in an interview. "But the budget and powers of this agency are influenced by all their talk and rhetoric about terrorism and criminals and if that isn't what they are doing, it should be considered by Congress and the public." Homeland Security spokesman Russ Knocke said the study failed to appreciate record-setting enforcement totals. "They seem not to grasp that immigration laws are a powerful authority in preventing security risks from setting foot on our soil," Knocke said. "The vast majority of immigration violations are either going to be criminals or economic migrants who arrive illegally, but we're tough for that off-chance one presents a national security concern." Terrorists have been barred, Knocke said, and new tools to help are going into place. That includes getting data on travelers well before they arrive and improving security of travel documents. A former New York Times reporter, Burnham is co-director of the Transactional Records Access Clearinghouse. The private research group at Syracuse University analyzed the work of two Homeland Security agencies &#151; Immigration and Customs Enforcement and Customs and Border Protection. TRAC analyzed records of the more than 200 immigration court judges employed by the Justice Department back through 1992 and the department's records of criminal cases brought in U.S. district courts. The records were acquired under the Freedom of Information Act. TRAC also found that a separate, broader category of national security charges were brought to try to deport an additional 114 people during the three years. Criminal charges such as human trafficking, drug dealing and other traditional crimes were used against 106,878, or 13 percent of those the government tried to deport. The overwhelming majority of deportation cases &#151; 86.5 percent &#151; were based on traditional immigration violations such as sneaking past border inspections, not having a valid visa or overstaying a student visa, TRAC said. TRAC found that Homeland Security agencies were credited during the period with producing or assisting on only 31 of 620 criminal prosecutions in district courts against defendants whom prosecutors labeled international terrorists, domestic terrorists or terrorism financiers. Last month, Assistant Secretary Julie L. Myers, who heads ICE, said: "Our mission remains clear &#151; to protect the United States and uphold public safety by targeting the people, money and materials that support terrorists and criminal activities." The customs commissioner, Ralph Basham, said in the agency's performance report for 2006: "Our priority mission &#151; and our greatest challenge &#151; is to prevent terrorists and terrorist weapons from entering the United States." The TRAC report said deportations and prosecutions are not the full measure of the agencies' anti-terror efforts, which also include patrolling borders and inspecting cargo. The study said some people suspected of terrorism may be charged only with lesser infractions because those are easier to prove and the maximum penalty for either charge in immigration court is removal from the country. Defending the performance, government officials note the absence of major terrorist attacks in this country since Sept. 11, 2001. But TRAC unearthed evidence the total of 12 persons targeted for deportation on 14 separate terrorist charges might have been too high. Only four charges were upheld by immigration judges; six charges were withdrawn by Homeland Security; one was not sustained; two are pending; and one was otherwise dealt with. On the other hand, the number might be too low if other terrorists have entered undetected and are waiting to attack. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government Reuters, AM ET New agency IARPA develops spy tools AP, AM ET UK fertiliser bomb plot at BBC, Apr 30 Terror Database Has Quadrupled In Four Years Increase in anti-terror targets In First for Britain, U.S. Citizen Is Extradited on Terror Charges at The New York Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles When Terrorists Become 'Warriors' Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Government - AP urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070530/ap_on_re_mi_ea/turkey_al_qaida Turkish police seize terror suspects police seize terror suspects AM ET ANKARA, Turkey - Police on Wednesday captured 11 suspected al-Qaida militants who allegedly were planning to stage terrorist attacks in Istanbul, officials said. Police did not provide any details about the identity of the suspected Islamic militants or their target. Local Islamic militants tied to al-Qaida killed 58 people in 2003 when they targeted two synagogues, the British consulate and a London-based bank in Istanbul. U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race Suspect: U.K. involved in ex-spy's death Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty minute ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. East News - AP Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070530/us_nm/newyork_taxis_dc Serial robber targeting New York taxi drivers of the Web Serial robber targeting New York taxi drivers - A serial robber is terrorizing New York City taxi drivers, having held up eight of them at gunpoint in less than two weeks, police say. Spokesmen for the police and taxi drivers say they cannot remember the last time one suspect has repeatedly targeted cabbies and said drivers may have let their guard down after years of declining crime rates. The latest incident was on Tuesday night when a large muscular man pulled a gun on a driver in midtown Manhattan, took money and fled on foot. A man fitting that description is also blamed for seven similar incidents in Manhattan since May 17. Many have taken place shortly before or after midnight, when police patrols change shifts. "This guy knows what he&#39;s doing. He usually strikes when there is a police shift change, which means that there are less cops in the street," said Fernando Mateo, spokesman for the New York State Federation of Taxi Drivers. The taxi federation and the crime-fighting group Guardian Angels have been raising awareness and advising drivers on prevention techniques. Police declined to reveal what they are doing do catch the suspect. TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology - 21 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 43 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. A New York City taxi drives through New York's Time's Square, May 30, 2007. (Brendan... Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070530/ts_alt_afp/usattacksciaprisoners Boeing subsidiary faces lawsuit over secret CIA transfers of the Web Boeing subsidiary faces lawsuit over secret CIA transfers - A leading US civil liberties group filed a lawsuit against a subsidiary of aircraft manufacturer Boeing on Wednesday, alleging involvement in the CIA&#39;s secret transfer of terrorist suspects. American Civil Liberties Union American Civil Liberties Union filed the case against Jeppesen Dataplan, Inc., on behalf of three alleged targets of the US &#39;s controversial "extraordinary rendition" program. The lawsuit charges that Jeppesen knowingly provided flight services to the that enabled the transportation of Ethiopian Binyam Mohamed, Italian Abou Elkassim Britel and Egyptian Ahmed Agiza to secret locations. Once in the secret overseas locations, the three were subjected to torture and other forms of cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment, the group alleges. "American corporations should not be profiting from a CIA rendition program that is unlawful and contrary to core American values," said Anthony Romero, executive director of the American Civil Liberties Union. "Corporations that choose to participate in such activity can and should be held legally accountable," he added. The complaint alleges that Jeppesen was one of the main providers of logistical support services for aircraft used by the CIA. The program allegedly involved US agents abducting terrorist suspects and moving them to secret locations around the world where they were routinely tortured or otherwise abused. According to the lawsuit, Jeppesen provided logistical support such as itinerary, route, weather, and fuel planning for 70 such flights since 2001. "Jeppesen&#39;s services have been crucial to the functioning of the government&#39;s extraordinary rendition program," said Steven Watt, one of the American Civil Liberties Union&#39;s attorneys. "Without the participation of companies like Jeppesen, the program could not have gotten off the ground," he said. The lawsuit was filed under the Alien Tort Statute, a law permitting aliens to bring claims in the United States for violations of other countries&#39; laws or US treaties. Full Coverage: Espionage & Intelligence Judge will release letters in Libby case AP, 5 minutes ago Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 23 minutes ago Shedding light on CIA mystery flights CIA flights controversy here to stay at BBC, Feb 14 Advisers Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation at The New York Assessments Made in 2003 Foretold Situation in Iraq at The Los Angeles Tenet of the Iraq war at Christian Science Monitor, May 09 TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Marine vet faces hearing over protest - 21 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 43 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. The American Civil Liberties Union filed a lawsuit against a subsidiary of aircraft manufacturer Boeing... Covert CIA prisons reported Civil Liberties Union Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. . France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070529/ap_on_re_as/afghan_us_prisoner American remains in Afghan jail remains in Afghan jail By JASON STRAZIUSO and MATT APUZZO, Associated Press Writers Tue May 29, 3:43 AM ET KABUL, Afghanistan - An American citizen imprisoned in for running a private jail for terror suspects has a new passport. His dog has been vaccinated for overseas travel. But two months after being freed by presidential decree, Jack Keith Idema remains in his Afghan cell. The reasons why, like most of Idema's dramatic personal story, are murky and complicated. They include a visa dispute and a compensation claim by one of his victims. They also involve documents that Idema says would finally prove his claim that he was a hired mercenary hunting al-Qaida suspects on a mission sanctioned by U.S. counterterrorism officials &#151; a claim that American authorities have denied. Idema's Afghan lawyer and prison officials say Idema could be only days from leaving the country. But Idema, a former Green Beret from Fayetteville, N.C., has appeared in no hurry to leave a prison cell that by local standards is top of the line. His self-described prison "suite," has its own kitchen, a private bathroom, couches, rugs, TV, Internet access and a small staff. He is also friendly with prison guards aligned with the Northern Alliance, the coalition of anti-Taliban militias that helped the U.S. drive the hardline militia from power in late 2001. "He is allowed to keep a dog, weapons and a cook. Why? Because the anti-Taliban factions of the Afghan government have never, not once, considered him a prisoner, but a temporary guest," Idema's U.S. lawyer, John E. Tiffany, said in a recent court filing. Idema is one of three U.S. citizens arrested in July 2004 and imprisoned at Policharki prison for abducting several Afghans and holding them in a makeshift jail in Kabul. Brent Bennet, another former soldier, was released last September, as was freelance journalist Edward Caraballo, who was filming their activities, in April 2006. Idema's detention is just the latest episode in a personal history that includes three years in U.S jail for fraud in the 1980s. He claims to have fought with Northern Alliance forces against the Taliban and was featured in a book about the Afghan war called "Task Force Dagger: The Hunt for bin Laden." Some of the Afghans Idema imprisoned in 2004 claimed they were beaten and their heads held under water. However, Idema says he never mistreated prisoners and the prosecution offered scant evidence at his sometimes chaotic Kabul trial, where he initially was sentenced to 10 years in jail. Idema told The Associated Press by cell phone from Policharki that it might be hard for people to understand why he has remained after President Hamid Karzai's decree in late March that freed him. But he said he risked arrest by Afghan intelligence agents and that departing would harm his chances of recovering documents, tapes and computer files that show his alleged relationship with U.S. officials. "My car is parked outside right now," Idema said. "I could drive through the Policharki gates right now. Then what happens? I get arrested. (The intelligence service) will arrest me for not having an Afghan visa and they'll torture me and kill me. If I'm lucky, I'm only going to be tortured." A U.S. federal judge in April said the United States had to respond to a lawsuit by Idema alleging that the State Department and illegally kept him imprisoned, directed his torture and destroyed evidence. Idema said he has audio recordings and documents to back up his claims. The U.S. Embassy in Kabul responded by saying that since Idema had been freed by Karzai, his claims no longer had merit. "Mr. Idema's habeas claim is moot because his criminal sentence has expired and because his continued presence in Policharki prison is due to his refusal to leave without his personal belongings," the U.S. said in a court filing. The U.S. said it has secured Idema a passport and helped him with travel information for him and Nina, a dog that Bennet had adopted. Idema, who is insisting on taking the animal with him, said it had received shots so that it could travel. Idema's Afghan lawyer, Rahim Ahmadzai, said Idema also wants $500,000 of equipment &#151; computers, cameras and weapons &#151; and a special passport returned from the Afghan government. "Jack's attitude is he wants compensation for that, otherwise he doesn't care if he has to spend the next 10 years in prison," said Ahmadzai. Another issue has been compensation demanded by one of the men Idema held in his prison. The man, a senior judge called Sadiq, originally had wanted $13,000 in compensation, but told the AP that he gave Idema a letter on Friday forgiving him. "Because I'm an Afghan Muslim, I forgive all these things," said Sadiq, who goes by one name. "I'm not his enemy, he's not my enemy." Abdul Salam Ismat, a senior Afghan justice official, said compensation claims usually cannot keep someone jailed. "For us, he's completely free. He's not a prisoner. But Mr. Idema's story is that he's safer inside Policharki, so he's staying there," Ismat said. "We could have kicked him out on the street after he was pardoned, but that might not have been well received by the international community." Associated Press reporter Jason Straziuso reported from Kabul. Matt Apuzzo reported from Washington. Retiring envoy commenst on Afghanistan AP, 19 minutes ago Taliban fire may have caused Afghan crash: NATO Reuters, 2 hours, 29 minutes ago Afghans' anger over US bombings Pakistan faces the Taleban's tentacles Taleban 'downed Nato helicopter' Suicide Attack and a Bombing Kill 4 and Wound 7 in Afghanistan at The New York Losing the 'other war' in Afghanistan? at International Herald Tribune, May 29 at Toronto Star (reg req'd), Apr 25 U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty minute ago minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. American Jonathan Keith Idema, 48, charged with running his own private prison and abuse of... News - AP elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070531/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/better_spy_tools New agency IARPA develops spy tools agency IARPA develops spy tools By KATHERINE SHRADER, Associated Press Writer AM ET WASHINGTON - Using a new laptop and a satellite link, agents can find out within two minutes whether the fingerprint from a newly captured suspect overseas matches a terrorist database in Virginia. Intelligence officials are running documents in languages such as Arabic through a new computer program called "English Now." It converts the foreign characters into the Roman alphabet and makes words such as Baghdad, jump out to spies who can't read Arabic. The language software and the fingerprint-recognition system are examples of new spy gear that the national intelligence director's office bought last year. They may seem like tools that should have been available years ago, but the government isn't noted for its ability to quickly develop new technology. A fledging center called IARPA is hoping to change that. The Intelligence Advanced Research Projects Activity will try to develop groundbreaking technology for the 16 spy agencies. One potential tool sounds like it comes from an episode of Star Trek: "cloaking" technology that can bend radar around an object to make it appear it's not there. Others include power sources shrunk using nanotechnology and quantum computers that can speed code-breaking, says IARPA acting director Steve Nixon. "The world has changed in dramatic ways with globalization of technology," Nixon said in an interview. "These are the things that might not get done otherwise." But not everyone is convinced this is the right way to make new spy tools. The House Intelligence Committee has questions about whether the government truly needs it. "Much of this research is already going on," said Rep. Heather Wilson ( ), R-N.M., the top Republican on the House Intelligence Committee's panel on technical intelligence. She said IARPA raises questions about the role of new National Intelligence Director Mike McConnell, who was supposed to coordinate U.S. intelligence agencies &#151; not get into their daily operations. "Is it to fund these things and pull them into the DNI's office and give itself its own turf and projects and pet rocks?" she asked. There is even resistance within the itself, according to officials who spoke about the concerns privately. The agency gets money that is supposed to go for spy tools that can be shared across the government. CIA spokesman Paul Gimigliano denied any friction, saying the agency welcomes ideas that promote collaboration on new technology. In the last half-century, U.S. spy agencies have made technical breakthroughs large and small. In the 1970s, the CIA shared its lithium-iodine batteries with the medical field, which now uses them in pacemakers. Its scientists developed microdot cameras that can produce images so small that they can be hidden in the period of this sentence. They also built a life-size robotic dragonfly that could have been used for surveillance, if only it could have handled crosswinds. If IARPA can clear some crucial hurdles, including convincing its congressional skeptics, the new office will be modeled after a similar agency that develops gee-whiz toys for the The Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency was created after the Russians launched Sputnik in 1957, driving home the U.S. competitive disadvantage in space. Since then, DARPA researchers have brought the United States much-heralded advances including stealth technology, global positioning systems and the Internet. But it also brought controversy. The agency's Total Information Awareness data-mining program was launched after the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks to use technology to find terrorists; critics saw it as a step toward Big Brother-style mass government surveillance. Congress eliminated the program's funding at DARPA in 2003, but portions were moved to secret accounts at other agencies. The new intelligence organization will be significantly smaller than DARPA, which has a $3 billion annual budget. It will be based at the University of Maryland and staffed with 56 intelligence professionals from the CIA and from McConnell's organization. Rather than funding IARPA in the House intelligence budget bill passed this month, lawmakers directed technology dollars to centers developing tools that can be shared across government, including offices within the CIA, National Security Agency and National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency. The measure included criticism of McConnell's office for failing to provide details on how IARPA will work and raised questions about whether it would harm existing research for spy tools. Nixon says IARPA won't have labs and electron microscopes, but will sponsor research at universities, national labs and other organizations. IARPA is thinking broadly, he said. It won't limit itself to hard sciences, but will also tackle social-science problems such as finding tools for language research or to help analysts measure cultural habits of another society. He also said the organization will work on privacy protection. NSA and other agencies want to be able to make better use of foreign intelligence information from overseas, which often contains information on U.S. citizens. Given the lack of oversight in intelligence agencies, "this is an area where the research community has to step gingerly," said Marc Rotenberg, executive director of the Washington-based Electronic Privacy Information Center. Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. photo provided by the CIA shows a the microdot camera to photograph and... Government - AP urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070530/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/gates Gates to cadets: World will be watching to cadets: World will be watching By ROBERT WELLER, Associated Press Writer PM ET AIR FORCE ACADEMY, Colo. - Defense Secretary Robert Gates told graduating Air Force Academy cadets Wednesday that the world will be watching as they fight the war on terror. Mistakes made on the battlefield against "enemies who possess no conscience and no remorse" will be magnified and transmitted globally in this Internet age, Gates warned the 977 members of the 49th academy class on a brisk, windy day beneath snowcapped Pikes Peak. "We live in an age when friends and enemies alike will seek out and focus on any and all mistakes made under great stress," he declared. "When you are called to lead, when you are called to stand in defense of your country in faraway lands, you must hold your values and your honor close to your heart." Gates said leaders must do what is right, even when it will bring bad publicity or sacrifice personal friendships. "Don't kid yourselves: More often than not, doing this means traveling a lonely and difficult road," he said. In highly publicized incidents, some U.S. forces have been accused of mistreating or wrongly killing insurgents or civilians in , including torture and humiliation of prisoners at Iraq's prison. Several U.S. Marines are accused of killing 24 civilians in Haditha, Iraq. A recent survey found that 39 percent of Marines said torture should be allowed to gather information from an insurgent. Against that backdrop, Gates commended Congress and the news media as "the two pillars of our freedom under the Constitution." He made similar remarks last week at the U.S. Naval Academy's commencement, when he told new naval officers they have the responsibility to inform people under their command that the military "must be nonpolitical" and to truthfully report to Congress, "especially when it involves admitting mistakes or problems." Gates noted that Wednesday's graduating class was one of the first to enter the academy after the Sept. 11, 2001, terror attacks. "You knew the dangers of the world you were entering, but you still chose to step forward," he declared. "It is by no means an easy future. We are engaged in two wars on the other side of the world and we are engaged in a global ideological struggle against some of the most barbaric enemies we have ever faced," he said. About 23,000 people attended the graduation Wednesday, an Air Force spokesman said. Gates was flying to Hawaii for meetings Thursday at U.S Pacific Command headquarters. On Friday he is scheduled to arrive in Singapore to attend an international conference on Asian security and meet separately with his counterparts from and other allied nations. Bush calls for global emissions goals Edwards wants probe of high gas prices sees South Korea model for Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Cease-fire eyed to stop violence in Iraq Sen. Clinton defends private jet travel Rice holds line on Iran nuclear program Bush sees South Korea model for Iraq Thompson moves toward White House bid Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago CNN minutes ago Stephanopoulos on Fred Thompson AM ET Raw Politics: Watchdogs barking CNN AM ET Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Esamu Daniel Cooper, front, jokes with fellow graduates before taking the oath of office... Defense Secretary Robert Gates House News - AP urges 15 nations to set global emissions goal Brinkley Describes Reagan&#39;s Inner Narrative Bush calls for global emissions goals "What would you include in legislation to address global warming?" Offer your ideas. SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070530/ap_on_re_us/homeland_insecurity Many in-house guards unregulated of the Web Many in-house guards unregulated By ANDREW WELSH-HUGGINS, Associated Press Writer AM ET COLUMBUS, Ohio - They wear uniforms, guard some of the country's largest corporations and sometimes carry weapons. But so-called in-house private security guards escape even the minor regulatory oversight some states impose on contract guards. Thousands of these guards &#151; also known as proprietary guards &#151; aren't regulated at all, with no mandatory training or background checks, state officials and industry experts say. In Florida, stores lobbied successfully to remove in-house guards from regulation. Florida licenses only armed in-house guards. Connecticut, Georgia and Michigan also exempt unarmed guards from regulation. Illinois and North Carolina require only that companies notify the state that they employ unarmed in-house guards. Ohio law doesn't regulate any in-house guards. California, New York and Oregon require unarmed, in-house security guards to obtain a license. Most other states have little or no regulation as long as the in-house guard doesn't carry a gun, according to state officials and experts representing both security guard companies and corporate security directors. "You need skills to deal with irate people with problems, and crowd control &#151; there's just too many things that you need to know," said Randy Blevins, an armed security guard at Riverside Hospital in Columbus. "I definitely think that there should be some way to regulate that." The lack of rules over in-house guards is another kink in a spotty system governing the country's private security guards. A survey by Associated Press bureaus in 50 states and the District of Columbia found a patchwork of state laws regulating the industry. Blevins, 30, a former Marine and sheriff's deputy, may be called to wrestle with unruly patients or calm emotional visitors. He's trained: The hospital requires its employees to take a six-month police training course and 40 hours of continuing education a year. In California, the bar and restaurant industry has fought regulation to avoid excessive oversight of bouncers, who could be affected by rules for in-house guards. Speedway Motorsports, a Concord, N.C.-based company with six racetracks nationwide, has a few of its own guards but also hires hundreds of temporary guards for weekend events each year. It considers off-the-street workers temporary in-house employees. "To get all of them licensed &#151; that would be ridiculous," said Doug Cremer, Speedway's manager of guest services and logistics. "We can do the screening process ourselves." A Connecticut bill to license uniform-wearing, in-house guards stalled this year. Arizona tried this year to draft a bill to regulate in-house guards but ran into opposition from companies that employ such guards. California last year began requiring in-house guards to be registered along with contract guards. Pending legislation would extend the same training requirements to in-house guards. Bar and restaurant owners in California &#151; whose security forces include part-time bouncers &#151; say the training bill ignores their needs and would benefit the private security companies that provide such training. "It's overkill and does not take into consideration the huge turnover we have," said Stephen Zolezzi, executive vice president of the Food & Beverage Association of San Diego. "In many cases these guys are security guards for four months and then they move on." Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government Reuters, AM ET New agency IARPA develops spy tools AP, AM ET UK fertiliser bomb plot at BBC, Apr 30 Terror Database Has Quadrupled In Four Years Increase in anti-terror targets In First for Britain, U.S. Citizen Is Extradited on Terror Charges at The New York Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles When Terrorists Become 'Warriors' TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Alabama gov. signs slavery apology - 22 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 44 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. Reeves shows off her identification card issued by the state department of Homeland Security... Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/csm/20070529/wl_csm/oswat Pakistan losing territory to radicals losing territory to radicals By David Montero, Correspondent of The Christian Science Monitor Tue May 29, 4:00 AM ET SWAT, Pakistan - In this valley of orchards near , 90 police hid along the banks of a riverbed in March, preparing to arrest the powerful Pakistani cleric Maualana Fazlullah. Informants said the target, charged with terrorism, would soon appear with a modest contingent of followers. Instead, Mr. Fazlullah rode into sight on a white horse, surrounded by hundreds of people. When the officers advanced, brandishing tear gas and batons, word flew through the town. Thousands more supporters turned out to further protect Fazlullah. The officers backed off in an incident that shocked the country, exposing as it did the state&#39;s powerlessness to apprehend a wanted terrorist. Such scenes are common in the tribal agencies of Waziristan, where the Taliban hold sway under a controversial truce signed with the government in September. But Swat is not Waziristan: It rests squarely in the North West Frontier Province (NWFP), a government-administered area long considered beyond such lawlessness. The rise of Fazlullah exposes the economic and political failures fanning extremism even in these areas, and hints at the consequences, both for Pakistan and the international community, if the province continues down a path of deprivation. Allow him to persist, many observers say, and others will be emboldened to roll back the state&#39;s policies of moderation &#8211; small but symbolically important gains in women&#39;s empowerment, girls&#39; education, and religious tolerance. "My opinion is, if you take him out today, there will be a reaction," says Asfandiar Amir Zeb, a former mayor of the district of Swat. "Leave it for a month, there will be a bigger reaction. If you leave it for six months, you won&#39;t be able to catch him." Many observers insist that, if the government openly supports a movement against Fazlullah, ordinary citizens will take up the call. Liberal forces abound throughout Pakistan&#39;s frontier with Afghanistan, but they lack leadership and support from the central government. "The majority of people are liberal. But there is no institution for the liberals. The government schools, to some extent, but they are very [few]," says Wajid Ali Khan, a former member of the provincial assembly from the Awami National Party. Fazlullah signals a dangerous tipping point: He is the local leader of Tehreek-e-Nafaz-e-Shariat-e-Mohammad (TNSM, or The Movement for the Enforcement of Islamic Laws), an armed militia that fought in Afghanistan alongside the Taliban. Police say he commands thousands of followers, is stockpiling weapons, and has growing links to Al Qaeda &#8211; all of which could turn the area into another terrorist haven. The urgency of the issue was underlined in April, when a British court sentenced five suspects to life for plotting attacks in Britain. Many of those sentenced received jihad training in Malakand, a district adjacent to Fazlullah&#39;s. From the vantage of the cosmopolitan capital, Islamabad, Pakistan is one of the most rapidly growing economies in Asia. But Swat, home to 1.5 million, is a reminder that the frontier has long been deprived of that wealth. The gradual death of an agrarian way of life in Swat, following increased mechanization and a series of land reforms that undercut sharecropping, has promoted the wealth of a few at the expense of thousands. With little local industry, residents of Swat have some of the lowest incomes per day in the province, a formula for discontent. Local officials in Swat complain they haven&#39;t received development funds from the federal government in more than two years. "If I had money, I would give [the city] a vision for development. But I don&#39;t have any money," says a frustrated Jamal Nasir Khan, a mayor of Swat based in Saidu Sharif, the district capital. Mr. Khan says he&#39;d like to build more schools and health facilities for the area&#39;s population, 49 percent of whom live below the poverty line and 61 percent of whom are illiterate. It is a problem repeated throughout the NWFP. "Since 1977, there has been no attempt at regional equality," says Karachi-based economist Kaiser Bengali. Although NWFP has some of the highest rates of poverty, illiteracy, and violence in Pakistan, it received just $34 million in federal aid and development grants in 2006, compared with Punjab&#39;s $210 million &#8211; even though Punjab, by many accounts, already has the healthiest economic indicators in Pakistan. "In some villages, the largest employer is the jihadis," Mr. Bengali adds. Swat is a startling example. Because unemployment is high, Fazlullah is able to summon hundreds of volunteers &#8211; who receive meals in exchange &#8211; to help build his new madrassah in Mingora, the city of 175,000 where he lives. Situated along the Swat River, the large religious school will someday offer poor students of this city, which has no university, a free education in Fazlullah&#39;s ultraconservative brand of Islam. Aides say proudly it will cost nearly $2.5 million, suggesting that while Fazlullah&#39;s audiences may generally be poor, he has wealthy patrons. Since he began preaching two years ago, Fazlullah has drawn more than 15,000 weekly to his Friday prayers. His vision of militant Islam reaches thousands more in the valley by way of his illegal radio station, which he used until recently to warn parents not to send their girls to school. Few parents seem to have heeded that warning, but the government still intervened in May, striking a compromise in which officials would look the other way if Fazlullah stopped preaching against girls&#39; education. "Tell me, what wrong have I done? I am preaching religion, and religion is not terrorism," Fazlullah says in a brick room on the site of his new madrassah, surrounded by bearded aides. People turn to cleric for justice Aside from work, many also turn to Fazlullah for justice. "We are making compromises between rival parties and ending enmities," says Fazlullah. Fazlullah&#39;s growing legitimacy exposes the void left by a justice system that is collapsing in the NWFP. Unlike North and South Waziristan and other parts of the Federally Administered Tribal Areas (FATA), state law technically applies here. But successive layers of bureaucracy &#8211; colonial, modern, secular, religious &#8211; have made justice, once free and quick, slow and more expensive. "There is no local justice, no economic justice. Corruption is a bigger problem than you imagine," says Shah Salam Khan, a lawyer of the district high court, mentioning payoffs to judges and police. In calling for sharia, or Islamic law, what residents really seek is good governance often neglected by the state, says Ayesha Siddiqa, a political analyst in Islamabad. It&#39;s a troubling analogy to North and South Waziristan, where local reports say that the Taliban have established their own courts and hospitals, offering services neglected by the state. And, as in those areas, Taliban violence has surged throughout the NWFP in the past year, suggesting that it, too, is becoming a haven for militancy. Nine criminal cases, including the charges of terrorism, have been filed against Fazlullah. The police say they suspect that he&#39;s formed links with terrorist groups like Jaish-e-Mohammed, which is suspected of collaborating with Al Qaeda in a spate of attacks, including a bombing last March in Karachi that killed an American diplomat. He denies these links. Yet the police say they cannot arrest Fazlullah. "We are ready to go after him anytime. But there are national activities," says Mohammad Yameen Khan, the district police officer of Swat, referring to President Pervez Musharraf&#39;s sacking of the country&#39;s chief justice, which has spawned growing protests. "You don&#39;t want to open too many fronts. The forces are committed elsewhere, in the burning places," he adds, referring to neighboring areas witnessing Taliban-related violence. Officials, cleric cut a deal In late May, despite the cases against him, Fazlullah signed a peace deal with local officials, agreeing to prevent his followers from running militant camps in return for keeping his radio station. Many observers say that the state is simply not interested in taking down the Fazlullahs of Pakistan. "These people remain a good tool of policy in the region, in Afghanistan &#8230; as well as internally," says Ijaz Khattak, a professor at the University of Peshawar. "If other liberal parties become stronger, they will challenge the regime. These people are there to stop them." &#8226; First of three parts. Wednesday: A city fights back against extremist voices. Pakistan&#39;s anti-Musharraf protests continue AFP, 1 hour, 17 minutes ago Militants kill 13 at Pakistan cleric&#39;s home AFP, 1 hour, 33 minutes ago Moderate voices from a Pakistani city The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, May 30 Pakistan opposition tastes blood at Asia Times Online, May 15 Thirteen die in Pakistan attack Tensions over Afghan refugee move Ahmed Rashid - Musharraf at the Exit at The Los Angeles U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty minute ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. so few bomb-safe US military trucks in Iraq? In Lebanon's camps, rising sympathy for Islamists Tasks for next World Bank chief: heal rifts, tackle poverty How US sanctions in Sudan will work G-8 to take up climate change Goal for these desert troops? Bag the buffelgrass. A speck of a species - felling pines across West - The Christian Science Monitor elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center The Christian Science Monitor
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070531/wl_nm/swiss_terrorism_dc Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government terror groups using Swiss base: government AM ET ZURICH (Reuters) - Islamic militants are using Switzerland as a base because of its strategic location and different legal system from surrounding countries, a government report published on Thursday said. The country may also face terror attacks itself, although no concrete evidence of any plans has yet been discovered, said a report by the Federal Police Office. "Switzerland serves Islamic-motivated terrorism as a place for retreat, preparation, logistics and propaganda," the Federal Police Office said. "Islamists, who are being prosecuted in the EU or who have served a prison sentence, seem to be choosing Switzerland as an alternative place to stay," the report said. Religious and ethnic tension has been on the rise in Switzerland, particularly focusing on Muslims, with rising immigration and lack of integration, analysts said. U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty minute ago minutes ago Vonage - Official Site Save $300 a year on your phone bill. A better phone service for less. elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070529/us_nm/security_qaeda_hashmi_dc Student pleads innocent to NY terrorism charges of the Web Student pleads innocent to NY terrorism charges Tue May 29, 3:32 - The first person extradited by Britain to the United States on terrorism charges pleaded not guilty to supporting al Qaeda in federal court on Tuesday. Syed Hashmi, 27, an American student who was studying in London before he was extradited to New York on Friday, is accused of providing military equipment to others who then transported it to al Qaeda associates in Pakistan. His lawyer called the charges unfounded, saying Hashmi was the victim of his association with an informant and self-confessed al Qaeda backer who won immunity in another case. Hashmi appeared in U.S. District Court in Manhattan with a long beard and dressed in a blue and orange prison outfit while relatives crowded the public benches. Hashmi replied "not guilty" to the charges. If convicted, he faces a maximum of 50 years in prison. Prosecutors allege that Hashmi, a Pakistani native who grew up in Queens, New York, agreed with others between January 2004 and May 2006 to provide military gear to al Qaeda to be used against U.S. forces in Hashmi, also known as "Fahad," was arrested at London&#39;s Heathrow airport in June 2006 as he was about to board a plane to Pakistan. Prosecutors said he was the first individual extradited from Britain to the United States on terrorism charges. Outside the courtroom, defense lawyer Sean Maher said Hashmi was a devout Muslim and "peace-loving" man who was being punished by the United States for participating in political protests against the U.S. government. "He is not a terrorist. He is an academic. These charges are unfounded," Maher said. Maher said his client suffered from knowing Mohammed Junaid Babar, who testified as an informant against five Britons convicted in London in April of plotting bomb attacks on targets such as nightclubs and trains. Babar pleaded guilty in New York in 2004 to smuggling money and military supplies, including night vision goggles and sleeping bags, to an al Qaeda figure in Pakistan. A plea deal led Babar to give evidence in the London trial where he was granted immunity from prosecution. Maher said the charges against Hashmi were "most likely" based on the words of Babar, who "has shown himself to be conniving, an opportunist and most of all unreliable." Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government Reuters, AM ET New agency IARPA develops spy tools AP, AM ET UK fertiliser bomb plot at BBC, Apr 30 Terror Database Has Quadrupled In Four Years Increase in anti-terror targets In First for Britain, U.S. Citizen Is Extradited on Terror Charges at The New York Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles When Terrorists Become 'Warriors' TB patient ID'd as Atlanta attorney, 31 Alabama gov. signs slavery apology set for Billy Graham library TB on a plane? Sign of the times son arrested on sex charge Marine vet faces hearing over protest - 22 minutes ago Children hanged: Language barrier slows 911 call AP - 44 minutes ago King of Spam Blocked minutes ago Bush asks for global emission goals by 2008 minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. & Osama bin Laden Note: Testing Fred Thompson Ala. students graduate in wake of vicious storm PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Limited. or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070531/wl_asia_afp/australiaattacksjustice Muslim nine deny terror charges in Australia nine deny terror charges in Australia AM ET SYDNEY (AFP) - Nine Muslim men detained in a series of police raids in 2005 pleaded not guilty Thursday to conspiring to commit a terrorist attack in Australia, at a hearing held under tight security. Some of the nine defendants, among a total of 18 men detained in Sydney and Melbourne in November 2005, smiled and waved to supporters at the New South Wales Supreme Court here. All of them refused to stand to enter their pleas of not guilty on religious grounds. The trial has been set for February next year. The men were charged with planning attacks between July 2004 and November 2005, with Australia&#39;s only nuclear reactor, at Lucas Heights in Sydney, reportedly one of their targets. At a committal hearing earlier this year, it was alleged they had recipes to make explosives and used false names to buy chemicals and other ingredients. Prosecutor Wendy Abraham said the men believed Islam was under attack and wanted to respond. "Violence was the primary tool of their jihad," she said. Lawyers for the men indicated they would challenge the legality of the indictments. At a separate committal hearing in Melbourne last September, a court found that there was enough evidence for 11 other men arrested in the November raids and in subsequent sweeps to stand trial on terrorism charges. The prosecutor in that case said the men were inspired by Al-Qaeda leader and that one of the accused, cleric Abdul Nacer Benbrika, had urged them to inflict "maximum damage" in Australia in the name of jihad. The men were arrested days after the government passed tough new anti-terrorism legislation making it easier for police to prosecute suspects involved in the early stages of planning attacks. Prime Minister John Howard pushed the legislation through parliament after expressing concern that Australia could face attacks similar to the deadly London transport bombings in July 2005. U.K. involved in ex-spy's death U.S.: Dead detainee was of high value Blair: G-8 must keep pledges to Africa Panda released into wild found dead Putin: U.S. has triggered new arms race There&#39;s something in the air in Rome: cocaine Putin issues sharp warning to US, vows to counter &#39;imperialism&#39; Panda Found Dead in Wild minutes ago Removal of Bullet Alleviates Headache minutes ago Spain fights for rights to shipwreck booty minute ago minutes ago with Bad Credit refinance requests only. Police patrol the perimeter of the heavily fortified court where nine Muslim men facing terrorism... elects surgeon as president Ex-KGB spy: UK tried to recruit me Missing Girl&#39;s Parents Blessed By Pontiff Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center . France Presse.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070530/ap_on_bi_ge/boeing_cia_suit ACLU: Boeing offshoot helped CIA Boeing offshoot helped CIA By PAT MILTON, Associated Press Writer A Boeing Co. subsidiary that may have provided secret flight services was sued Wednesday by the American Civil Liberties Union American Civil Liberties Union on behalf of three terrorism suspects who claim they were tortured by the U.S. government. The lawsuit charges that flight services provided by Jeppesen Dataplan Inc. enabled the clandestine transportation of the suspects to secret overseas locations, where they were tortured and subjected to other "forms of cruel, inhuman and degrading treatment." The ACLU said the company "either knew or reasonably should have known" that they were facilitating the torture of terrorism suspects by providing flight services for the CIA. Companies "are not allowed to have their heads in the sand, and take money from the CIA to fly people, hooded and shackled, to foreign countries to be tortured," ACLU attorney Ben Wizner said. Boeing itself is not named in the lawsuit and would not confirm the reports of a Jeppesen-CIA link, said spokesman Tim Neale, adding that customers have a confidentiality clause. Jeppesen Dataplan says it provides services such as flight plans, fuel and airport data to airlines, private pilots and various companies, but it doesn't ask its customers for details of their business. "We don't know the purpose of the trip for which we do a flight plan," said Mike Pound, a spokesman for the Englewood, Colo.-based Jeppesen. "We don't need to know specific details. It's the customer's business, and we do the business that we are contracted for," he said. "It's not our practice to ever inquire about the purpose of a trip." Jeppesen had no immediate comment on specifics of the lawsuit. The lawsuit was filed Wednesday in U.S. District Court in Northern California, but announced in New York City. The three detainees have claimed through their family and lawyers that they have been tortured and abused against universally accepted legal standards. One claimed to have been routinely tortured under interrogation about al-Qaida and . Their attorneys appealed to the ACLU for assistance. The cases involve the alleged mistreatment of Binyam Mohamed, an Ethiopian citizen, in July 2002 and January 2004; Elkassim Britel, an Italian citizen, in May 2002; and Ahmed Agiza, an Egyptian citizen, in December 2001, ACLU officials said at a Manhattan news conference. Mohamed is currently being held in Guantanamo Bay, Cuba; Britel in Morocco and Agiza in Egypt, the ACLU said. The ACLU says the suspects were apprehended under the U.S. government's "extraordinary rendition program." Extraordinary rendition is the clandestine capture and transfer of suspects to be detained and interrogated in countries where the protection of U.S. laws do not apply, according to Wizner. "American corporations should not be profiting from a CIA rendition program that is unlawful and contrary to core American values," said Anthony D. Romero, executive director of the ACLU. "Corporations that choose to participate in such activity can and should be held legally accountable." Neither the CIA nor the U.S. government is named in the lawsuit. Wizner said the executive branch has evoked a state secrets defense in similar lawsuits. The Bush administration has insisted it receives guarantees from countries receiving terror suspects that prisoners will not be tortured. Associated Press Writer Paul Elias in San Francisco contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Espionage & Intelligence Judge will release letters in Libby case AP, 12 minutes ago Russian suspect says British secret service killed Litvinenko AFP, 30 minutes ago Shedding light on CIA mystery flights CIA flights controversy here to stay at BBC, Feb 14 Advisers Fault Harsh Methods in Interrogation at The New York Assessments Made in 2003 Foretold Situation in Iraq at The Los Angeles Tenet of the Iraq war at Christian Science Monitor, May 09 Economy nearly stalled in first quarter Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine Economy nearly stalled in first quarter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - PM ET Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. First 3 Months at 1/2 price. Free Domain Name & Setup. 24/7 Support. Try Forex Currency Trading at Forex.com Free $50,000 practice account with real-time charts, news and research. The tarmac of the Mihail Kogalniceanu Airbase, east of Bucharest, indicated by Human Rights Watch... Civil Liberties Union GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070530/ap_on_bi_ge/ernst___young_fraud Indictment: Sept. 11 used in tax fraud Sept. 11 used in tax fraud By LARRY NEUMEISTER, Associated Press Writer A former top lawyer and three other Ernst & Young partners reduced taxes for Americans making $10 million or more with a fraud that even used the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks to disguise their lies, according to an indictment charging the men. The four current and former partners of the giant accounting firm were arrested Wednesday and charged with fraud and other crimes relating to tax shelters that were devised beginning in early 1998, the indictment unsealed in U.S. District Court in Manhattan said. The men defrauded the IRS from 1998 to 2004 by designing, marketing and selling fraudulent tax shelters that made it appear as if customers were making investments when they actually were moving money around solely to dodge taxes, the indictment said. The indictment portrayed Robert Coplan as central to the plan. Coplan, a Plano, Texas, lawyer, once was a branch chief in the IRS' Legislation and Regulations Division. He worked for Ernst & Young in its Washington, D.C., office, though he has since left the firm. In one 2001 letter, Coplan tells a salesperson not to advise clients in writing about strategies for tax shelters because the ultimate goal is to "make our strategies appear to be investment techniques that have advantageous tax consequences," the indictment said. The court document said Coplan drafted another letter in 2001 to be signed by clients who terminated trading partnerships after obtaining their tax benefits. In that letter, the indictment said, "clients falsely attributed their decision to discontinue their trading activities to the Sept. 11, 2001, terrorist attacks and to `possible economic repercussions resulting from such attacks.'" Coplan, 54, said the letter could be used "as a means of establishing a logical reason for winding down the trading account in the partnership," the indictment said. Coplan was released on $1 million bail after a brief appearance in court Wednesday. His lawyer declined to comment outside court. U.S. Attorney Michael Garcia said in a statement that the indictment targets "tax professionals whose deceit costs this country untold millions in tax revenues." Ernst & Young said in a statement that it has cooperated with the government from the start of the investigation and has voluntarily made changes to its tax practice. The indictment said the four men knew that if the IRS discovered the tax shelters it would aggressively challenge the claimed tax benefits. To hide the tax fraud from the IRS, the partners created documents containing false and fraudulent descriptions of the clients' motivations for entering into the transactions, the indictment said. Court papers said the men enticed clients to participate in the shelters by getting law firms to provide letters claiming that the tax shelter losses or deductions would "more likely than not" survive IRS challenge. The letters were crucial because the IRS could impose substantial penalties ranging from 20 percent to 40 percent of the underpayment unless the claimed tax benefit was supported by an independent opinion, the indictment said. The partners were seeking entry into the highly lucrative tax shelter market that was already being explored by other companies, the indictment said. Besides Coplan, those charged were Martin Nissenbaum, 51, of Brooklyn, a lawyer; Richard Shapiro, 58, of Rye Brook, N.Y., also a lawyer; and Brian Vaughn, 39, of Calhoun, La., an accountant. Nissenbaum and Shapiro were each freed on $1 million bail, while Vaughn was freed on $300,000 bail. All the defendants pleaded not guilty. Nissenbaum and Shapiro are current partners on administrative leave. Vaughn is a former partner. They were charged with crimes including conspiracy to defraud the IRS, tax evasion, making false statements and impeding the IRS. A lawyer for Shapiro, John J. Tigue Jr., said in a statement that authorities are prosecuting an innocent man. He said Shapiro for five years has fully cooperated with investigators. "He intends to vigorously defend himself against these baseless charges at trial," Tigue said. Nissenbaum lawyer Brian Linder said in a statement that his client had cooperated over the last year with investigators and provided proof of his innocence. He said his client expects to be acquitted. A lawyer for Vaughn, Peter Barrett, said his client "looks forward to trial in this case, to his acquittal and a complete exoneration of all these allegations of wrongdoing." Ernst & Young said in its statement that the men, none of whom was among the firm's management, were part of a small group within the firm that partook in the transactions. The group was disbanded years ago, the company said. Economy nearly stalled in first quarter Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for &#36;6.8B Northwest exits bankruptcy protection Stocks up after takeover news, GDP data FDA nixes fast track for cancer vaccine Economy nearly stalled in first quarter Wellpoint CFO ousted, violated code of conduct Wachovia to buy A.G. Edwards for $6.8 billion Leaner Northwest Airlines exits bankruptcy First-quarter growth weak, future looks brighter Wal-Mart Report Spells Trouble AM ET Dell to sell &#39;in Wal-Mart&#39; BBC AM ET College Loan Rates to Increase AM ET Traders floored by NYSE change CNN - PM ET Make Money in Growth Stocks. We have a Winner for You. Chase® Home Equity Loan Low rates. No closing costs. No app fee. No annual fees. Apply online. Online Currency Trading - Free Demo 24-Hour trading, award-winning software, charts and more from GFT. A portion of a Form 1040 Individual Income Tax Return in an image courtesy of... - Taxes and Tax Season GM plant is nation&#39;s most productive Silicon Insider: High Tech Labor Day S&P&#39;s run: A record for a new era Optimists take charge, and summer interns rule. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos.
http://news.yahoo.com/i/2807 Terrorism on Yahoo! News Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government AM ET ZURICH (Reuters) - Islamic militants are using Switzerland as a base because of its strategic location and different legal system from surrounding European Union countries, a government report published on Thursday said. New agency IARPA develops spy tools AM ET WASHINGTON - Using a new laptop and a satellite link, FBI agents can find out within two minutes whether the fingerprint from a newly captured suspect overseas matches a terrorist database in Virginia. Muslim nine deny terror charges in Australia AM ET SYDNEY (AFP) - Nine Muslim men detained in a series of police raids in 2005 pleaded not guilty Thursday to conspiring to commit a terrorist attack in Australia, at a hearing held under tight security. 9 terror suspects plead not guilty AM ET SYDNEY, Australia - Nine men accused of stockpiling bomb-making chemicals and plotting to avenge perceived injustices against Muslims pleaded not guilty to all charges Thursday in Australia's largest alleged terrorist conspiracy. Court upholds &#36;2.8M Iran terrorism claim PM ET SAN FRANCISCO - The brother of an Iranian terrorism victim can collect $2.8 million from a California company that owes Iran for a canceled weapons shipment, a federal appeals court ruled Wednesday. 20 suspects charged in Lebanon fighting PM ET BEIRUT, Lebanon - A military judge filed terrorism charges Wednesday against 20 suspected members of an Islamic militant group fighting Lebanese troops at a Palestinian refugee camp, court officials said. Indictment: Sept. 11 used in tax fraud A former top Internal Revenue Service lawyer and three other Ernst & Young partners reduced taxes for Americans making $10 million or more with a fraud that even used the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks to disguise their lies, according to an indictment charging the men. ACLU: Boeing offshoot helped CIA A Boeing Co. subsidiary that may have provided secret CIA flight services was sued Wednesday by the American Civil Liberties Union on behalf of three terrorism suspects who claim they were tortured by the U.S. government. Boeing subsidiary faces lawsuit over secret CIA transfers - A leading US civil liberties group filed a lawsuit against a subsidiary of aircraft manufacturer Boeing on Wednesday, alleging involvement in the CIA&#39;s secret transfer of terrorist suspects. Gates to cadets: World will be watching PM ET AIR FORCE ACADEMY, Colo. - Defense Secretary Robert Gates told graduating Air Force Academy cadets Wednesday that the world will be watching as they fight the war on terror. Serial robber targeting New York taxi drivers - A serial robber is terrorizing New York City taxi drivers, having held up eight of them at gunpoint in less than two weeks, police say. Turkish police seize terror suspects AM ET ANKARA, Turkey - Police on Wednesday captured 11 suspected al-Qaida militants who allegedly were planning to stage terrorist attacks in Istanbul, officials said. Lebanon charges 20 jihadists with terrorism AM ET NAHR AL-BARED, Lebanon (Reuters) - Lebanon charged 20 members of Fatah al-Islam with terrorism on Wednesday and Lebanese troops battled jihadists from the militant group at a Palestinian refugee camp in the north for an 11th day. Many in-house guards unregulated AM ET COLUMBUS, Ohio - They wear uniforms, guard some of the country's largest corporations and sometimes carry weapons. But so-called in-house private security guards escape even the minor regulatory oversight some states impose on contract guards. Terrorism suspect: Charges unfounded Tue May 29, 4:40 An American student extradited from London on charges that he provided al-Qaida fighters with equipment to attack U.S. soldiers is an activist, not a terrorist, his lawyer said Tuesday after the man pleaded not guilty. Student pleads innocent to NY terrorism charges Tue May 29, 3:32 - The first person extradited by Britain to the United States on terrorism charges pleaded not guilty to supporting al Qaeda in federal court on Tuesday. Yarmuth’s Job Security Gets Test From Kentucky’s Ex-Homeland Security Chief Tue May 29, 8:00 AM ET Political campaigning rarely takes time off in Kentucky, which holds its elections for governor in odd-numbered years. And most of the attention in Kentucky politics currently is focused on the battle between incumbent Republican Gov. Ernie Fletcher and Democrat Steve Beshear, a former lieutenant governor, that was set up by their victories in the May 22 primary. Pakistan losing territory to radicals The Christian Science Monitor - Tue May 29, 4:00 AM ET SWAT, Pakistan - In this valley of orchards near Afghanistan, 90 police hid along the banks of a riverbed in March, preparing to arrest the powerful Pakistani cleric Maualana Fazlullah. Informants said the target, charged with terrorism, would soon appear with a modest contingent of followers. Instead, Mr. Fazlullah rode into sight on a white horse, surrounded by hundreds of people. American remains in Afghan jail Tue May 29, 3:43 AM ET KABUL, Afghanistan - An American citizen imprisoned in Afghanistan for running a private jail for terror suspects has a new passport. His dog has been vaccinated for overseas travel. But two months after being freed by presidential decree, Jack Keith Idema remains in his Afghan cell. Study: Terror deportations remain stable Mon May 28, 7:21 PM ET WASHINGTON - U.S. immigration agencies say anti-terrorism is their primary mission, but they tried to deport only 12 people on terrorism-related charges from 2004 through 2006, according to a private research study released Sunday. Spain arrests 16 terror suspects Mon May 28, 5:41 PM ET MADRID, Spain - Spanish police arrested 16 people Monday on suspicion of recruiting volunteers to fight in Iraq and other countries. Spanish police arrest Islamist Jihad suspects Mon May 28, 9:58 AM ET MADRID (AFP) - Spanish police arrested 15 suspected Islamist militants in a series of nationwide anti-terrorist raids Monday, the interior ministry said, adding they were suspected of membership of a terrorist organisation. Israel&#39;s Peretz ousted as Labour leader Mon May 28, 6:30 PM ET TEL AVIV (AFP) - Israeli Defence Minister Amir Peretz was ousted as Labour party chief on Monday night, leaving an ex-premier and a former general neck and neck in a key primary which threatens Prime Minister Ehud Olmert&#39;s ruling coalition, polls and unofficial results showed. British police could get anti-terror stop and question powers Sun May 27, 11:11 PM ET LONDON (AFP) - Prime Minister Tony Blair Sunday accused courts and parliament of putting the rights of suspects before national security as it emerged that police may get powers to stop and question people in the street. Israel vows to press on with Gaza military action Sun May 27, 6:17 PM ET JERUSALEM (Reuters) - A Hamas rocket attack from Gaza killed a man in Israel on Sunday and Prime Minister Ehud Olmert pledged unlimited military action against the militant group, saying "no one involved in terror" would be immune. Ala. terror Web site angers activists Sun May 27, 5:53 PM ET MONTGOMERY, Ala. - The Alabama Department of Homeland Security has taken down a Web site it operated that included gay rights and anti-war organizations in a list of groups that could include terrorists. U.S. has two-part strategy with Iran Sun May 27, 3:31 PM ET WASHINGTON - The United States is pursuing a two-track strategy with Iran that reflects the high stakes in any engagement with a nation President Bush accuses of bankrolling terrorism and secretly building a nuclear bomb. Israeli killed in Palestinian rocket attack Sun May 27, 6:42 AM ET JERUSALEM (Reuters) - A Hamas rocket attack from Gaza killed a man in Israel on Sunday and Prime Minister Ehud Olmert pledged unlimited military action against the militant group, saying "no one involved in terror" would be immune. Israel, Hamas trade threats as rocket kills civilian Sun May 27, 2:56 PM ET JERUSALEM (AFP) - Israel and Hamas traded threats on Sunday as an Israeli civilian died in a second deadly rocket strike from Gaza within a week and the Jewish state pursued its relentless pounding of militant targets. Bush defends &#39;war on terrorism&#39; label Sat May 26, 10:15 PM ET WASHINGTON (AFP) - Hours after the September 11, 2001 attacks, US President George W. Bush declared "war on terrorism." In August 2004, he said that was the wrong label, but then quickly re-embraced it. More in Yahoo! News U.S. News & World Report File photo shows security men guarding the China Eastern Airlines&#39; building in Shanghai. China Eastern... Osama bin Laden and al-Qaida &raquo; More Top Stories Photos Get the Untold Story Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone: Covering all of the world's conflicts. &raquo; Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone Freshen up your PC and make it look and run just like new. The latest Iraq news, analysis, photos, video and more. &raquo; More Iraq Coverage about
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070603/pl_afp/usattacksairport Foiled US airport bomb plot was &#39;home-grown&#39; - Yahoo! News Foiled US airport bomb plot was &#39;home-grown&#39; Sun Jun 3, 5:28 PM ET WASHINGTON (AFP) - A foiled plot to bomb New York&#39;s main international airport was a "home-grown" plan not directly linked to Al-Qaeda, though the militant Islamic network may have inspired it, a top US justice official said Sunday. The plotters had "as far as we know, no direct ties to Al-Qaeda," Assistant Director John Miller told ABC news on Sunday. But he appeared to connect the planned attacks to the Al-Qaeda network&#39;s influence. "They pump out the propaganda encouraging it, while they plan the next big one (attack), and I think you can see that in the eight or so plots that have been unraveled in the last roughly two years" on US soil, he said. "When you&#39;re looking at inspired through the Internet, home-grown extremists, well they can pop up anywhere." The plot against the JFK airport allegedly was linked to Jamaat Al Muslimeen, described by justice officials as an international network of Muslim extremists from the United States, Guyana and Trinidad. Jamaat Al Muslimeen is "a group that&#39;s been engaged in violence. They&#39;ve taken hostages," Miller said. Four suspected Islamic extremists from South America and the Caribbean have been charged over the plot, including a US citizen Russell Defreitas who was a cargo handler at the airport, and Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana&#39;s parliament. Three of the suspects have been arrested and a fourth, Guyanese national Abdel Nur, is still being sought. In Port-of-Spain, Commissioner of Police Trevor Paul said Saturday that Kadir and Trinidadian Kareem Ibrahim were arrested in Trinidad on Friday and Saturday respectively. According to US authorities, the plot went back to January last year and would have involved blowing up buildings, fuel tanks and pipelines at the airport, which handles 1,000 flights and more than 120,000 passengers daily. "They had done up to four surveillances. They were searching for funding and explosives. So on that level, it was certainly operational," Miller said. Authorities said the explosions would also have devastated large portions of nearby Queens, a borough of New York City. New York Police Commissioner Raymond Kelly said there was "no direct connection to core Al Qaeda" but said the suspects were attracted to the terror network&#39;s ideas. "It&#39;s a philosophy. And they&#39;re motivated by the same hatred that motivates Al Qaeda," Kelly said on CBS television. Democratic Senator Diane Feinstein praised authorities for disrupting the plot but said the country was still under threat from a possible terrorist attack. "Clearly, this was nipped in the bud before it developed, and I think that&#39;s very impressive and we all should be very thankful," Feinstein told CNN television. "Having said that, our alert status has to remain," she said. The plot was uncovered barely three weeks after another alleged "home-grown" terror plan was uncovered with the arrest of six suspected Islamic radicals on charges of conspiring to attack the US army base of Fort Dix in New Jersey. Other alleged plots believed to have been thwarted in New York since the September 11 attacks included plans to blow up a subway station and to bomb commuter train tunnels linking Manhattan to New Jersey. Miller downplayed earlier reports that Al-Qaeda had a minimal presence in the United States, stressing that the movement&#39;s "propaganda" aimed to inspire home-grown plotters. "Qaeda continues every day to try and plan the larger, spectacular attack, something along the lines of a 9/11 equivalent," he said, referring to the massive attacks on the United States in 2001. "At the same time, they pump out an awful lot of propaganda aimed at getting those who think they can find the wherewithal to act on their own to do that." Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. People walk inside Terminal Four at John F. Kennedy Airport (JFK) in New York, 02... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070602/ap_on_go_ca_st_pe/us_asia Gates considers roots of terrorism - Yahoo! News Gates considers roots of terrorism By ROBERT BURNS, AP Military Writer Sat Jun 2, 6:47 AM ET SINGAPORE - Declining to say whether the U.S. and its partners are winning the war on terror, Defense Secretary Robert Gates called Saturday for more focus on combating poverty and other underlying causes of extremism. "I think we are still early in this contest," Gates said in a question-and-answer session with attendees of a conference on Asian security, an annual gathering that took on an unusual dimension with the participation of a senior Chinese general who offered a pointed defense of his country's military buildup. In a speech to the gathering known as the Shangri-la Dialogue, Gates called on Asian nations to contribute more to the war on terrorism and to ensure that not be allowed to slip back into chaos. He touched only lightly on China, whose military buildup had been a central focus of previous conferences. And while Gates mentioned the war and warned of security risks posed by the nuclear ambitions of North Korean and , he focused more on broader themes of terrorism and U.S. commitments in Asia. "In particular, the challenge posed by terrorists inspired by radical ideologies cannot be overcome by any one nation &#151; no matter how wealthy or powerful," he said, alluding to U.S. efforts to build a lasting coalition. A member of the audience later asked Gates whether he thought the United States is winning the terror war. He cited areas of progress, including the elimination in late 2001 of Afghanistan as a haven for al-Qaida. But he also said the Islamic extremists have managed since then to expand their recruiting grounds. "On the negative side of the ledger, I think we have not made enough progress in trying to address some of the root causes of terrorism in some of these societies, whether it is economic deprivation or despotism that leads to alienation," he said. He called for more "creative thinking" to address the root causes of Islamic extremism, but he added that even those efforts will not be the complete answer to winning what he called a long war on terrorism. "One of the disturbing things about many of the terrorists that have been caught is that these are not ignorant, poor people," he said. "These are educated people, often from professional families. So dealing with poverty and those issues is not going to eliminate the problem, but it certainly can reduce the pool of people prepared to give their lives for this cause." After Gates spoke, a Chinese general addressed the conference and said, in response to a question from the audience, that China expects a final agreement in September on a long-standing U.S. proposal to establish a "hotline" between the two countries' defense leaders for use during crises. Lt. Gen. Zhang Qinsheng, deputy chief of China's General Staff and the highest ranking Chinese officer to participate in the Singapore conference, said technical issues had held up a hotline agreement. He said he would be attending meetings in Washington in September where "we will finalize" a deal. Although Gates spoke only briefly about China, Zhang delivered a detailed refutation of U.S. assertions that Beijing has been overly vague about the level and purposes of its defense spending and military modernization. He said, for example, that of the $45 billion in this year's defense budget -- which the last week said might actually be as high as $120 billion -- $20 billion is consumed by pay raises and other improvements in living conditions for Chinese troops. Millions more are being spent on new uniforms, he said. The published Chinese defense budget is "true and authentic," he said, according to an English translation. Zhang said Beijing remains committed to peaceful cooperation with other Asian and Pacific nations. "China shall never fire the first shot," he said. In his exchange with members of the audience &#151; primarily government officials and security experts &#151; Gates was asked how long U.S. intelligence agencies think it will take Iran to build a nuclear weapon. "The general view of American intelligence is that they would be in a position to develop a nuclear device probably sometime in the period 2010-2011 or 2014 or 15," he said, adding that some think it could be as early as late next year. "The reality is that because of the way Iran has conducted its affairs we really don't know, and it puts a higher premium, it seems to me, on the international community coming together in terms of strengthening sanctions on Iran so that they begin to face some serious trade-offs in terms of their economic well being and their economic future, for having nuclear weapons." On Iraq, Gates spoke positively of the Bush administration's new troop buildup and counterinsurgency effort. "The immediate goal is to create the breathing room necessary to allow reform and reconciliation to go forward &#151; steps that will give all of Iraq's communities, majority and minorities alike, a stake in that nation's future," he said. "Whatever your views on how we got to this point in Iraq, it is clear that a failed state in that part of the world would destabilize the region and embolden violent extremists everywhere." Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. U.S. Secretary of Defense, Robert Gates listens to the opening address of the IISS... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) White House News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070603/ap_on_re_eu/britain_terror_laws Gordon Brown plans new anti-terror laws - Yahoo! News Gordon Brown plans new anti-terror laws By TARIQ PANJA, Associated Press Writer Sun Jun 3, 7:17 AM ET LONDON - Britain's incoming leader Gordon Brown will unveil a raft of new hardline anti-terrorism measures when he replaces Prime Minister later this month, British newspapers reported Sunday. The Sunday Times and The Observer both carried detailed outlines of proposals that they say Treasury chief Brown will make public this week. In 2005, British lawmakers rejected the government's bid to allow police to detain terror suspects without charge for up to 90 days, forcing it to accept a compromise of 28 days. But Brown will seek to revive the proposals, the papers said. He will also call for judges to have greater powers to punish terrorism by making it an aggravating factor in sentencing, and will call for a review of laws banning the use of phone tap evidence in court. The security services have long resisted calls for intercept intelligence to be used as evidence, saying it give could terrorists an insight into their methods. The Sunday Telegraph said that Brown would promise at all stages to give the courts and Parliament "greater oversight" over his proposed counter-terror measures, following clashes between government and opposition groups including the judiciary and civil liberty groups. "We must maintain a commitment to liberty, British traditions and the British way of life," the paper quoted an unnamed Brown source as saying. At a meeting with members of his Labour Party in Scotland on Saturday, Brown gave an indication that he is seeking changes to the country's anti-terrorism laws. "We must be vigilant for the benefit of security in this country," he said. "Anti-terror must be more sophisticated, with earlier intervention. That is why I support an increase in the length of detention to build up evidence across nations and I support post-charge questioning with an increase in police resources." Any moves by Brown to strengthen the terrorism laws are likely to be met by the same tough opposition that Blair had. Blair suffered his first major domestic defeat in 2005 when lawmakers, including members of his Labour Party, rejected his plan to allow police to hold terror suspects for up to 90 days without charging them with an offense. The government also has been constantly overruled by the judiciary in its attempts to deport foreign nationals it suspects of being engaged in extremist activities. Last week Blair launched an attack on against opponents of the government's approach to anti-terrorism, saying that they imperiled Britain's safety by putting civil liberties ahead of Britain's security. Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. British Chancellor Gordon Brown during the Labour hustings in the City Halls, Glasgow, Scotland Saturday... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Europe News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/terrorism_plot_trinidad Yahoo! News TONY FRASER, Associated Press Writer PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. Yasin Abu Bakr, the leader of Jamaat al Muslimeen, told The Associated Press he knew "nothing" about the alleged plan to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the airport, a plot authorities say was hatched by a group that included a former Guyanese politician. U.S. authorities claim the alleged plotters sought support in Trinidad from Jamaat al Muslimeen, which staged a deadly coup attempt in the Caribbean nation in 1990. The men did not receive such support, according to court documents. But the documents also say that Abdel Nur, a Guyanese suspect thought to be still at large in Trinidad, said he met in May with Abu Bakr at his compound in Trinidad and the Islamic leader suggested that he return later with others involved "to discuss the plan in detail." Nur allegedly said the Jamaat al Muslimeen leader also wanted to do further checks on Russell Defreitas, the 63-year-old accused mastermind of the plot, and an unidentified confidential informant who had infiltrated the group, the documents said. Abu Bakr declined to say if he knew the men, but also denied any involvement. "I know nothing about these men, and I have nothing to do with whatever they are being charged for," he said in his first public comments since U.S. authorities disclosed the plot on Saturday. Two of the suspects &#151; Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim of Trinidad &#151; are in custody in Trinidad. Nur was being sought by Trinidadian authorities. Defreitas, a U.S. citizen native to Guyana and former JFK air cargo employee, was jailed in the United States. Abu Bakr's group, often accused of aiming to create an Islamic state in Trinidad, describes itself simply as a religious organization. The group stormed Parliament and took the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage in a 1990 rebellion that left 24 dead &#151; the only Islamic revolt in the Western Hemisphere. The rebels eventually surrendered and were later pardoned. It is not known to have international reach, although a member was convicted of trying to smuggle 70 assault rifles to Trinidad from Florida in 2005. Abu Bakr faces charges stemming from a 2005 sermon in which he called for war against rich Muslims who refuse to pay zakaat, an Islamic tithe used to alleviate poverty. The following week, he was arrested by police who razed the group's compound and charged him with sedition and incitement to violence. "You know why they are linking me with this so-called plot is to bias the minds of jurors who will be sitting in my case," he said. Separately, a lawyer for the two men held in Trinidad said they would fight extradition to the United States. Ibrahim and Kadir made their initial court appearance Monday for extradition on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the U.S. government. "We will be opposing extradition," said Rajid Persad, a lawyer who represents both men. The judge set another hearing for June 11 to consider bail and scheduled an extradition hearing for Aug. 2. Farid Scoon, another lawyer for the men, said they intend to seek bail. The extradition fight could be a drawn-out affair. Ibrahim and Kadir could appeal all the way to the Privy Council in Britain, the highest court of appeal for the former British territory. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 28 minutes ago 31 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Trinidadian Kareem Ibrahim, 56, arrives to the Magistrate Court for an extradition hearing in downtown... Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070603/ts_afp/usattacksairportjustice Islamic suspects face charges in alleged terror plot in NY - Yahoo! News Islamic suspects face charges in alleged terror plot in NY by Luis Torres de la Llosa Sun Jun 3, 5:50 AM ET NEW YORK (AFP) - Four suspected Islamic extremists from South America and the Caribbean faced charges Sunday over an alleged terrorist plot to bomb fuel tanks and pipelines at John F. Kennedy Airport in New York. The four -- including Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana&#39;s parliament -- have been charged over the plot, which officials said had links to international terrorist cells in the Western Hemisphere but was thwarted well before it could be carried out. "Had the plot been carried out, it could have resulted in unfathomable damage, deaths, and destruction," US Attorney Roslynn Mauskopf said, telling reporters in New York the plan was "one of the most chilling plots imaginable." The devastation such a blast would have caused "is just unthinkable," she said on Saturday. The plot allegedly tapped into Jamaat Al Muslimeen, described by justice officials as an international network of Muslim extremists from the United States, Guyana and Trinidad. US anti-terrorist forces arrested one of the suspects, Russell Defreitas, a former employee at JFK airport, in New York on Friday. In Port-of-Spain, Commissioner of Police Trevor Paul said that Guyanese ex-legislator Kadir and Trinidadian Kareem Ibrahim were arrested in Trinidad on Friday and Saturday, respectively. Kadir is a former mayor and lawmaker in his country with the Peoples National Congress Reform-One Guyana (PNCR-1G). The fourth suspect, Abdel Nur, also a Guyanese citizen, is believed to be hiding in Trinidad and Tobago, Paul said, though US officials said they believed he was at large in Guyana. Defreitas was alleged to have said in a conversation recorded by an US agent who had infiltrated the group that blowing up the airport would have been of great symbolic importance and like killing late US president Kennedy again. "Any time you hit Kennedy, it is the most hurtful thing to the United States," he was alleged to have said. "They love John F. Kennedy like he&#39;s the man.... If you hit that, this whole country will be in mourning. "It&#39;s like you can kill the man twice." He was also alleged to have compared the plot to the September 11 attacks on New York&#39;s World Trade Center in 2001. "Even the Twin Towers can&#39;t touch it," he was alleged to have said. "This can destroy the economy of America for some time." According to US authorities, the plot went back to January last year and would have involved blowing up buildings, fuel tanks and pipelines at the airport, which handles 1,000 flights and more than 120,000 passengers daily. The pipeline network extends into neighborhoods which could have been devastated. Defreitas allegedly used his knowledge of airport operations to identify targets and escape routes and assess airport security, while also using satellite photographs of the airport downloaded from the Internet. Another conversation, in which Kadir, an engineer by training, explained to his alleged co-conspirators that the fuel tanks would require two explosions suggested the plotters had some technical expertise. White House spokeswoman Jeanie Mamo said only that President George W. Bush President George W. Bush had been briefed on the investigation and that the operation was "a good example of international counter-terrorism co-operation." The bombing plot was uncovered barely three weeks after the arrest of six suspected Islamic radicals on charges of plotting to attack the US army base of Fort Dix in New Jersey. In that case the suspects, including a pizza delivery man who allegedly used his job to case out the base, were arrested May 7 as they tried to buy automatic rifles. Two undercover informers had earlier infiltrated the group. Kenneth Wainstein, assistant attorney general for national security at the US , drew a parallel between the two cases. "Like the Fort Dix case several weeks ago, this plot highlights the evolving nature of the terrorist threat we face," he said. "Our investigation into both plots highlights how our agents and prosecutors are refining their capability to detect and pre-empt such plots before they advance to a dangerous stage." Other alleged plots believed to have been thwarted in New York since the September 11 attacks included plans to blow up a subway station and to bomb commuter train tunnels linking Manhattan to New Jersey. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws Jun 4, 10:33 AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago People walk inside Terminal Four at John F. Kennedy Airport (JFK) in New York, 02... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: President George W. Bush Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate The Christian Science Monitor In nouveau riche India, even the poor show off People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_as/singapore_terror_hoax Man jailed after false terror threat - Yahoo! News Man jailed after false terror threat Mon Jun 4, 6:25 AM ET SINGAPORE - A Canadian man accused of making hoax calls to police claiming there was a terrorist onboard an Air India flight was sentenced to three years and eight months in prison by a Singapore court Monday. Nanda Sudhir Kumar, 53, was convicted of three counts of "communicating false threats of terrorism acts," an offense under a set of laws the city-state adopted after the Sept. 11, 2001, terror attacks in the United States. Court documents show Kumar made three calls from public phones to the police on Nov. 6, alleging that a terrorist was onboard an Air India flight from Singapore to New Delhi and would crash the plane that day. The flight was subsequently delayed for more than three hours for the plane to be offloaded and bomb-swept, the documents showed. Kumar was arrested a week later and charged in January. He denied the charges. District Judge Victor Yeo said Kumar's false threat caused a "tremendous waste of precious resources and massive inconvenience," and created unnecessary public anxiety. Kumar, who is out on bail, has appealed his sentence, lawyer Subhas Anandan told could have been fined up to $65,000 and jailed five years. Leaders of Singapore, a staunch U.S. ally and wealthy Southeast Asian nation, say the country is a prime target for terrorists. In recent years, authorities have detained dozens of suspected members of the Jemaah Islamiyah terror group for plotting attacks against key Western targets in the city-state. Ten members remain in detention. Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 42 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Asia News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/ts_nm/usa_plot_trinidad_dc JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court - Yahoo! News JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Mon Jun 4, 12:56 PM ET PORT OF SPAIN (Reuters) - Two suspects in a foiled plot to blow up New York&#39;s John F. Kennedy International Airport appeared in court in Trinidad and Tobago on Monday and were accused of conspiring to commit terrorism. Abdul Kadir, a citizen of Guyana and former member of its parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim, a citizen of Trinidad and Tobago, are among four suspects in the case, which has brought attention to a sun-drenched Caribbean region previously not associated with Islamic radicalism. They were led into a packed Port of Spain court in handcuffs at about 9:30 a.m. EDT (1330 GMT) for a brief initial appearance before Chief Magistrate Sherman McNichols. "They have been accused of an offense to commit a terrorist act under the laws of the United States," David West, an attorney representing the U.S. government, told the judge. Kadir and Ibrahim, bearded and clad in loose-fitting traditional Muslim clothing like many of the courtroom spectators, looked calm and kept mostly silent during the 20-minute hearing in which McNichols told them they faced possible extradition to the United States. Formal extradition proceedings won&#39;t take place until a hearing set by McNichols for August 2. There was no request for bail at Monday&#39;s hearing and Rajiv Persad, a lawyer for the defense, said he needed more time to prepare the case. A third suspect, Russell Defreitas, a U.S. citizen and native of Guyana, was arrested in New York. U.S. authorities said he was a former airport employee who conducted surveillance for the group, using his knowledge of the site to identify targets and escape routes. U.S. authorities have said Kadir and a fourth suspect, Abdel Nur of Guyana, who was believed to be at large in Trinidad, were associates of Jamaat al Muslimeen, a Muslim group behind a 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad, but did not have links to al Qaeda. Trinidadian Police Commissioner Trevor Paul was expected to provide an update Monday afternoon on the search for Nur. The group has not yet commented on the plot to blow up Kennedy airport&#39;s jet fuel tanks and part of the 40-mile (64-km) pipeline feeding them. This twin-island southern Caribbean nation of 1.3 million people is almost equally divided between descendants of African slaves and Indian laborers sent to the Caribbean by the British in the 19th century. Muslims comprise 6 percent to 8 percent of the population and most are descended from the Indian laborers but the small Jamaat sect is mostly made up of Islamists of African descent. In his brief remarks in court, Ibrahim acknowledged under questioning from McNichols that he was Winston Kingston before he took his Muslim name. He said he was also known as Amir Karim. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 26 minutes ago 29 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Viewed: Top Stories Insurgent video shows IDs of missing soldiers Danish artist to paint Mont Blanc red Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Taylor boycotts war crimes trial Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Andrew Speaker&#39;s Parents and In-Laws Jun 4, 10:33 AM ET When Good Baseball Managers Go Bad minutes ago Police Commissioner of New York City Raymond Kelly speaks about four people, who have been... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Initial tests negative for lawyer with TB Poll: Bush Base Erodes on Immigration Debate Personal histories shape immigration views People of the Web A violent video puts a blogger behind bars. Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone An Afghan child bride gets help from Hot Zone readers. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/trinidad_radical_islamists Trinidad Islamic group under scrutiny - Yahoo! News Trinidad Islamic group under scrutiny By TONY FRASER, Associated Press Writer Sun Jun 3, 8:52 PM ET PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - A radical Islamic group known for launching a bloody 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad faced growing scrutiny at home and abroad well before an alleged U.S. terrorist plot focused new attention on it. The four suspects named on Saturday in the plot to attack John F. Kennedy International Airport in New York tried to enlist the help of Jamaat al Muslimeen, according to U.S. court documents. But the group, whose followers are largely black converts to Sunni Islam, has faded as a political force in Trinidad as its charismatic leader, Yasin Abu Bakr, fends off criminal charges of inciting violence. In 1990, Abu Bakr's group stormed Parliament and took the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage in a rebellion that left 24 dead &#151; the only Islamic revolt in the Western Hemisphere. The rebels eventually surrendered and were later pardoned. Though they did have contact, Jamaat al Muslimeen is not accused of offering any support to the men involved in the plot to blow up the New York airport, its fuel tanks and a jet fuel artery. Analysts are not surprised. "They haven't identified themselves as a terrorist group," said Anthony Bryan, a senior associate at the Washington-based Center for Strategic and International Studies. "They're identified more in terms of protection rackets in Trinidad and Tobago," said Bryan, who was doing research in Trinidad. The suspects allegedly traveled to this twin-island Caribbean nation off the coast of Venezuela to lobby Abu Bakr, but only one met with him. Heavy surveillance of the group and its leaders apparently made communication difficult. One suspect, Abdul Kadir, allegedly told an informant that he expected difficulty reaching out to Bakr because of the security. "Everybody is zooming in on him. So I don't know if he'll be available," Kadir said. Kadir, a former member of Guyana's parliament, and a second suspect were arrested on Friday in Trinidad, where police were searching for a third member of the alleged Muslim terrorist cell that planned to kill thousands by blowing up a jet fuel artery. A fourth suspect, a U.S. citizen native to Guyana, was arrested in New York. Trinidad and Tobago Police Commissioner Trevor Paul said Sunday that he had "no new information" to report on the search for the suspect at large, Abdel Nur of Guyana. In Guyana, an official and acquaintances of Nur said he had been deported from the U.S. in the late 1980s after a drug violation and called Americans "oppressors." Inspired by black nationalist movements in the United States and elsewhere, Jamaat al Muslimeen formed in the 1970s and built a private compound including a mosque and school. It has drawn followers among poor urban blacks but remained underground and the number of members is unknown. Abu Bakr, a former police officer who converted to Islam, blamed the government for widespread poverty that followed the collapse of world oil prices. Nur, the suspect at large, said Abu Bakr suggested during their meeting in Trinidad that he return later with others involved "to discuss the plan in detail," according to the U.S. court documents. He reportedly said he also wanted to conduct "checks" on the other plotters. Phone calls to Abu Bakr's office seeking comment went unanswered Sunday. Bakr's group, often accused of aiming to create an Islamic state in Trinidad, describes itself simply as a religious organization. It is not known to have international reach, although a member was convicted of trying to smuggle 70 assault rifles to Trinidad from Florida in 2005. Abu Bakr faces charges stemming from a 2005 sermon in which he called for war against all rich Muslims who refuse to pay zakaat, an Islamic tithe used to alleviate poverty. The following week, he was arrested by police who razed the group's compound and charged with sedition and incitement to violence. He was questioned but not prosecuted in connection with a 2005 series of at least four bombings in the capital Port-of-Spain. opened a permanent office in Trinidad in 2005, partially to investigate the unsolved bombings. At the time, FBI chief Robert Mueller said he had no reason to believe there were terrorist cells in Trinidad or Tobago, but said there are "persons of interest" living in the Caribbean nation. Nur was detained Feb. 13 by Guyanese detectives at the request of the FBI, fingerprinted, and released, according to a police commander in Guyana who spoke on condition of anonymity because he was not authorized to release the information. After he was named as a suspect, police went to his house and seized Islamic books and documents including receipts from international money transfers, the commander said. Nur, a Muslim originally named Compton Eversley who is now in his late 50s, worked odd jobs for a foreign-exchange office and smoked drugs at night but appeared harmless, said Rudy Thorne, an employee of the rooming house where he lived in a low-income area of Guyana's capital, Georgetown. "He left for Trinidad about three weeks ago and did talk about Americans as oppressors," Thorne said. "Other than that he was very quiet." Colleagues of former lawmaker Kadir in Guyana have expressed disbelief that he could be involved in the alleged plot. The father of nine children including two Iranian-trained Islamic scholars, Kadir had never expressed extremist views or hatred of the United States, said James McAlister, who served with him in parliament. Associated Press writers Michael Melia in San Juan, Puerto Rico, and Bert Wilkinson in Georgetown, Guyana, contributed to this report. Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Trinidad and Tobago Police Commissioner Trevor Paul speaks during a news conference in Port of... Tighter airport security after terror arrests One day after officials foil a terror plot to blow up New York&#39;s Kennedy Airport, Logan International Airport in Boston tightens security at its fuel supply facilities. (June 3) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070602/ap_on_re_us/terrorism_extradition No bail for man in NYC terror gear case - Yahoo! News No bail for man in NYC terror gear case By DAVID B. CARUSO, Associated Press Writer Sat Jun 2, 8:29 AM ET NEW YORK - A federal judge ordered a man held without bail while he awaits trial on charges that he provided al-Qaida fighters with equipment to attack U.S. soldiers. Syed Hashmi, a 27-year-old former New York resident, was arrested in England last spring after one of his alleged collaborators began cooperating with British authorities. Last week, Hashmi became the first terrorism suspect extradited to the United States by British authorities. On Tuesday, he pleaded not guilty to being part of a conspiracy to equip Islamic fighters and help them stay warm and dry while battling U.S. forces in Hashmi, who was born in Pakistan but became an American citizen as a child, maintains that he is a nonviolent intellectual, and had no knowledge of any schemes being hatched by militants he met while living abroad. His lawyer, Sean Maher, asked U.S. District Judge Loretta Preska on Friday to allow his client to await trial under house arrest at his parents' home in Queens. "He is not going to be a threat to anyone in the community," Maher said. Preska rejected the request after prosecutors argued that Hashmi was an extremist who opposed secular rule in the United States and joined a political organization that raised money for Hezbollah and Hamas. If convicted, Hashmi could face decades in prison. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 29 minutes ago 32 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_el_pr/democrats_debate Analysis: Leadership in debate forefront - Yahoo! News Analysis: Leadership in debate forefront By BETH FOUHY, Associated Press Writer Mon Jun 4, 9:31 AM ET MANCHESTER, N.H. - Questions of courage and political leadership emerged at the latest Democratic debate, as and Barack Obama ( ) over whether they had demonstrated leadership on key issues. Two long-shot hopefuls &#151; Mike Gravel and &#151; denounced what they called the lack of leadership by congressional Democrats after voters returned them to power last November. With a new Washington Post/ABC News poll showing Clinton far ahead of her rivals nationally, the former first lady projected an air of confidence and a mastery of the subject matter at Sunday's forum. She also insisted Democrats should focus their policy critiques on Republicans, especially "The differences among us are minor. The differences between us and Republicans are major, and we don't want anybody in America to be confused," she said. She chuckled as her rivals were quizzed over what role her husband, former President , would play in a Democratic administration. The consensus: He'd be a roving global ambassador. Obama, who in the first debate in late April appeared nervous and insufficiently prepared, had a smoother delivery this time and a more detailed grasp of policy issues. So it was left to Edwards, struggling to catch up to Clinton and Obama in most national polls, to throw the sharpest elbows, accusing them of being passive and cautious on urgent issues, like , health care and gay rights. "The job of the president of the United States is not to legislate but to lead," he said &#151; a point he repeated several times. One strategist said Edwards' approach was bold but potentially dangerous. "John Edwards clearly has a new strategy to isolate Senator Clinton and defuse Senator Obama on the war and other key issues," Democratic strategist Stephanie Cutter said. "It's a smart but risky strategy to differentiate from others to maintain top-tier status, but it's a fine line between aggressive and desperate." Edwards applauded Clinton and Obama for voting last week against legislation to fund military operations in Iraq after a timeline for removing troops was stripped from the bill. But he said the votes didn't demonstrate the level of political leadership voters expect. His rivals, Edwards said, "did not say anything about how they were going to vote ... they were among the last people to vote," Edwards said. "I think all of us have a responsibility to lead on these issues." Edwards, a former North Carolina senator, voted in 2002 to authorize military action in Iraq and was a forceful defender of the war during his first presidential bid in 2004. That led Obama, who as an Illinois state senator opposed the war before it started, to jab back at Edwards. "You're about four and a half years late on leadership on this issue," Obama said. Obama and Edwards also tangled over details of their respective health care plans, with Edwards arguing that Obama's proposal would not provide universal coverage. Obama said his plan focused primarily on bringing down costs and said that mandatory health coverage was meaningless if consumers couldn't afford to pay for it. Clinton stood quietly between the two as they bickered, letting through an occasional bemused smile for the cameras. Edwards had tough words for the former first lady, too, batting back her contention that the differences among the candidates were unimportant. "There are differences between us, and I think Democratic voters deserve to know the differences between us," he said. Clinton lobbed back at Edwards over his contention that the war on terror is little more than a "bumper sticker" slogan. "I am a senator from New York. I have lived with the aftermath of 9/11, and I have seen firsthand the terrible damage that can be inflicted on our country by a small band of terrorists," she said. With the so-called "top-tier" candidates &#151; Clinton, Obama and Edwards &#151; grabbing the most screen time during the debate, Sens. Chris Dodd and Joe Biden and New Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson did what they could to break through. They got a chance when all eight candidates were asked what their top priority would be for their first 100 days in office. &#8226; Edwards: "travel the world" and "re-establish America's moral authority." &#8226; Clinton: bring home U.S. troops from Iraq. &#8226; Obama: bring home U.S. troops and push for national health care. &#8226; New Mexico Gov. Bill Richardson: upgrade U.S. schools and push a $40,000-a-year minimum wage for teachers. &#8226; Delaware Sen. Joe Biden: end the war in Iraq and defuse tensions with &#8226; Ohio Rep. Dennis Kucinich: help "reshape the world for peace" and end all nuclear weapons. &#8226; Former Alaska Sen. Mike Gravel: Remind Congressional leaders they can end the war in Iraq now. &#8226; Connecticut Sen. Chris Dodd: "Restore constitutional rights in this country." Richardson also stressed his efforts to expand health insurance in his state and criticized the immigration bill moving through Congress, while Biden displayed his knowledge of global affairs as head of the Senate Foreign Relations Committee Senate Foreign Relations Committee Dodd outlined his proposal for energy independence, which he has tried to make the signature issue of his presidential bid. Beth Fouhy covers presidential politics for Coverage: Presidential Election 2008 McCain, Romney clash over immigration AP, 37 minutes ago Huckabee: Thompson buzz like cartoon AP, 47 minutes ago Clinton borrows page from husband's playbook at Boston Globe, Jun 04 Democrat rivals try to make their mark at BBC, Jun 04 On Romney's bus in Iowa, seats are free at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Democratic candidates clash over Iraq at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 A night for Obama and Biden at Boston Globe, Jun 04 Iraq takes all the oxygen at Boston Globe, Jun 04 Rep. Jefferson indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Analysis: The 2008 authenticity race Romney clash over immigration Most Viewed - Politics Feds say La. congressman to be indicted Democratic congressman indicted in bribery probe Bush opens Europe trip on jarring note Robberies surge on violent crime survey McCain, Romney clash over immigration minutes ago Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago The &#39;Internet War&#39;: Blogging From Iraq minutes ago Cold War Rhetoric: Building Missile Defenses minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Democratic presidential candidates (L-R) former U.S. Senator John Edwards (D-NC), U.S. Senator Hillary Rodham Clinton... Debate winners and losers CNN&#39;s team of political analysts breaks down the Democratic debate. &raquo; More CNN video Democrats debate the war on terror Democratic presidential candidates clashed on Sunday on Iraq and over the security of the country since the Sept. 11, 2001, terror attacks. (June 3) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Candidates Skirmish on Iraq, Health Care Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Family ties at issue as Senate returns to immigration The Note: Meet The New John Edwards Poll: Opinions go against immigration measure SEND US YOUR PHOTOS! Following the presidential campaign? Submit pictures of candidates, supporters, and events to You Witness News. Featured IN YAHOO! NEWS Election coverage and analysis from Congressional Quarterly. &raquo; More from Congressional Quarterly People of the Web A gay blogger makes waves, and enemies, on Capitol Hill. All news on Chief Justice Roberts, Samuel Alito's nomination, and more. &raquo; All Court Coverage Yahoo! News Search Now Contains Blogs Find the latest posts about what's in the news. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070603/ap_on_re_us/terrorism_plot_pipeline Terror threat first for pipeline firm - Yahoo! News Terror threat first for pipeline firm By RICHARD PYLE, Associated Press Writer Sat Jun 2, 8:19 PM ET NEW YORK - A foiled plot to blow up a jet fuel pipeline under John F. Kennedy International Airport drew attention to what counterterrorism experts have warned could be a key target. On Saturday, three men, one of them a former member of Guyana's parliament, were arrested and one was being sought in Trinidad as part of a plan that intended to "cause greater destruction than in the Sept. 11 attacks" in a neighborhood surrounding the airport, according to an indictment. It was the first threat against Buckeye Pipe Line Co., which operates petroleum conduits in 18 states, the company said. Its pumping facility in Linden, N.J., has 45 storage tanks pumps turbine fuel, gasoline, diesel and other fuel and heating oils through two 12-inch pipes to customers in New York City, including JFK and LaGuardia airports. The network totals 35 miles within the city alone. Roy Haase, a spokesman at Buckeye Partners LP, in Breinigsville, Pa., declined to discuss details of the plot or the security measures of the company, which operates pipelines ranging more than 5,000 miles. "There was a time when we would brag about our safety and security features, but we would not do that now, for fear we would be undermining them," Haase said. Buckeye works closely with federal , New York fire and police and the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, which operates the area's three major airports, Haase said. "We have been kept fully informed and apprised of this potential threat from the very beginning," Haase said. Authorities called the plot "chilling," though it never got beyond the planning stages to kill several thousand people and destroy parts of New York's borough of Queens, where the line runs underground. An explosion's force would depend on the amount of fuel under pressure and likely would be "restricted" and not travel up and down the line., said Richard Kuprewicz, a pipeline expert and president of Accufacts Inc., an energy consulting firm that focuses on pipelines and tank farms. "That doesn't mean wackos out there can't do damage and cause a fire, but those explosions and fires are going to be fairly restricted," he said. While pipelines have been the target of terrorism in Britain, Colombia and Turkey, records show only one other recent threat against a pipeline in the United States. A report prepared for Congress last year said that federal authorities have warned of Al Qaida interest in pipelines as targets, especially the Alaska pipeline that handles 17 percent of U.S. domestic crude oil production. "To date there have been no known Al Qaida attacks on TAPS or other U.S. pipelines, but operators remain alert," it said. In 2006, a Pennsylvania man was arrested for allegedly plotting to sabotage the Trans-Alaska Pipeline System (TAPS) and other petroleum facilities in New Jersey and Wyoming. There is no record that he was charged. Matt Verrinder in Trenton, N.J., contributed to this story. Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. The Buckeye Pipeline Co. facility is seen in Linden, N.J., Saturday, June 2, 2007. Four... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070603/wl_uk_afp/britainattackspolitics Brown promises tough new anti-terror measures - Yahoo! News Brown promises tough new anti-terror measures Sun Jun 3, 1:01 PM ET LONDON (AFP) - Gordon Brown said Sunday he will propose giving police increased powers in questioning terror suspects when he becomes prime minister but promised to preserve Britain&#39;s cherished civil liberties. Brown, the long-serving Chancellor of the Exchequer who succeeds on June 27, told governing Labour Party members that the public must recognise that it faces "a new security problem" requiring new anti-terror legislation. As part of nationwide debates about the party&#39;s post-Blair era, Brown told a gathering in the northern city of Newcastle he would be "tough in the security measures that are necessary to prevent terrorist incidents in this country." But Brown said he would make sure that "at no point will our British traditions of supporting and defending civil liberties be put at risk." Civil libertarians and many in Labour&#39;s traditional left have criticised government anti-terror measures, especially in the wake of the July 7, 2005 suicide bombings attacks which killed 52 London commuters. But Brown, long viewed as closer to Labour&#39;s left than Blair, said: "There has got to be independent judicial oversight. There has got to be proper parliamentary accountability. "We should give the police the power to question people so we can both prevent incidents and get to the bottom of some of these very, very strange dealings," Brown said. During a party meeting in the Scottish city of Glasgow, Brown made it clear he would revive government plans to have police hold suspects for longer periods without charge as well as question suspects after they have been charged. In front-page articles, The Sunday Times and The Observer, provided further details of the measures which they would be released this week and include plans to: -- extend the 28-day limit on detaining terror suspects without charge to 90 days; -- move towards allowing phone-tap evidence to be used in court; -- make terrorism an aggravating factor in sentencing, allowing judges to give harsher sentences; -- boost the security budget, which has already doubled to more than two billion pounds (four billion dollars, three billion euros) a year since the September 11, 2001 attacks on the United States; -- give lawmakers greater powers to scrutinise the heads of the security services in public. Blair, who has often said the terror threat to Britain is different in nature from any national threat faced before, wanted to give detectives 90 days to grill terror suspects back in 2005. However, he was forced to limit it to 28 days -- though it was still more than the original 14 days -- after MPs rejected the plan in his first defeat as prime minister in parliament&#39;s lower House of Commons. His drive was in response to police concerns about the length of time it took to gather information covering several countries, different languages and a multitude of Internet sites. On phone tapping, the security services have long resisted calls for intercepted intelligence to be used as evidence, fearing terrorists would gain an insight into their methods -- a stance Blair backs. Brown told a Labour Party meeting in Glasgow on Saturday "anti-terror methods must be more sophisticated, with earlier intervention." Brown also said that Al-Qaeda "probably" has 60 offshoots around the world in which they use sophisticated financial networks and false identities. Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Gordon Brown, pictured 02 June 2007, said Sunday he will propose giving police increased powers... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) London Transport System Bombings &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070603/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/trinidad_terrorism_plot Trinidad holds 2 in alleged terror plot - Yahoo! News Trinidad holds 2 in alleged terror plot By TONY FRASER, Associated Press Writer Sun Jun 3, 3:07 AM ET PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - Two men allegedly involved in a plot to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport were in custody in Trinidad and Tobago on Saturday and the police commissioner said authorities were scouring the Caribbean country for a third suspect still at large. Trevor Paul, the top police official in the twin-island nation off Venezuela's coast, identified the arrested suspects as Abdul Kadir, 55, a Guyanese Muslim and former member of the South American nation's Parliament, and Kareem Ibrahim, a 56-year-old from Trinidad. Both were arrested on U.S. warrants and are suspected of involvement in a plan to blow up a fuel line feeding the airport, Paul told a news conference. Abdel Nur of Guyana was still being sought in Trinidad, U.S. officials said. U.S. authorities allege Kadir, Ibrahim, Nur and another Muslim man, Russell Defreitas, planned to attack the airport, kill thousands and wreak economic havoc by blowing up a jet fuel artery that runs through residential neighborhoods. The plot never got beyond the planning stages, officials said. Defreitas, an American citizen native to Guyana and a former JFK employee, was in custody in Brooklyn. did inform the Trinidad law enforcement authorities of the fact that three men were wanted in the U.S. on warrants in connection with a terrorist plot. We have been working with the FBI for some time, but this last request was made yesterday," Paul said. Paul said the two suspects would likely be extradited to the U.S. after court hearings in Trinidad. He did not say when their first court appearance in Port-of-Spain would be. U.S authorities said Kadir and Nur were longtime associates of a Trinidadian radical Muslim group, Jamaat al Muslimeen, which launched an unsuccessful rebellion in 1990 that left 24 dead. "We understand that Kadir is linked to a major organization in Trinidad," Guyanese President Bharrat Jagdeo, who is in Port-of-Spain at a regional agriculture conference, told reporters. He would not disclose further details. Kadir's wife, Isha Kadir, told The Associated Press that her husband, a Shiite Muslim, is innocent. She said her husband flew from Guyana to Trinidad on Thursday on his way to Venezuela, where he planned to pick up a travel visa to attend an Islamic religious conference in . Kadir was arrested at Trinidad's international airport on Friday after he had boarded a flight to Venezuela, Paul said. "We have no interest in blowing up anything in the U.S," Kadir's wife said. "We have relatives in the U.S." U.S. authorities alleged in court papers that the suspects hoped to gain support in the attack from Jamaat al Muslimeen and its longtime leader. They never managed to present the plan to the group's leader, Yasin Abu Bakr, and they never secured his support, the documents said. Phone calls to the leader of Jamaat al Muslimeen went unanswered Saturday. Ibrahim was also arrested on Friday in a cane farming town about 20 miles east of Port-of-Spain. Trinidadian authorities did not disclose more about that arrest. Kadir served in Guyana's parliament until last year when it was disbanded before general elections in the former Dutch and British colony on the north coast of South America. Muslims, most of them Sunnis, make up about 9 percent of the Guyana's 770,000 population. Kadir studied civil engineering at the University of Guyana and at the Trinidad campus of the University of the West Indies and has also served as mayor in Linden, a small city about 70 miles south of Georgetown, the Guyanese capital. He also worked for years as a civil engineer in the state-owned bauxite company before leaving to set up his own building contractor business. Kadir's wife said her husband knew Abdel Nur in Guyana in the 1980s but they were no longer in contact. "We have not seen him for a long time and I would be surprised if my husband has any links with him still," she said in a phone interview from her home in Guyana. Kadir was a friend and associate of an Iranian cleric, Muhammad Hassan Abrahemi, who was abducted, shot to death and left in a sand pit east of Georgetown in 2004. He and his wife have three children, who have all studied religion in Iran, Isha Kadir said. She said she suspects her husband's arrest is linked to two American Muslims who stayed with the family in Guyana for a week last month. She knew one only as Muhammed and did not know the other's name. "I am now wondering if those Muslim brothers did not set us up," she said. "I can't say for sure but we have nothing to hide. We are not involved in anything." She said she planned to travel to Trinidad to try to meet with her husband before he is extradited to the United States. Associated Press Writer Bert Wilkinson contributed to this report from Georgetown, Guyana. Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Trinidad and Tobago Police Commissioner Trevor Paul speaks during a news conference in Port of... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070604/us_nm/usa_crime_tamil_dc Suspected U.S. head of Tamil Tigers pleads innocent - Yahoo! News Suspected U.S. head of Tamil Tigers pleads innocent 2 hours, 1 minute ago NEW YORK (Reuters) - The suspected head of the U.S. branch of Sri Lanka&#39;s Tamil Tigers rebel group and four others pleaded not guilty on Monday to charges of assisting a foreign terrorist organization. Karunakaran Kandasamy is accused of heading the U.S. branch of the Tamil Tigers and of funneling hundreds of thousands of dollars to fund its activities. Imprisoned since his April 25 arrest, he faces up to 15 years in prison if convicted, federal prosecutors said. The remaining defendants are charged with lesser offenses, including conspiring to provide material support to a foreign terrorist organization and bribing public officials, lawyers said. The United States designates the Tamil Tigers as a foreign terrorist organization. The rebels, known officially as the Liberation Tigers of Tamil Eelam, or LTTE, have been fighting for decades for an independent homeland on the north and east of the teardrop-shaped island in the Indian Ocean. Fighting has killed 68,000 people since 1983, including more than 4,000 in the past 16 months. Prosecutors said the Tamil Tigers rely on sympathetic expatriates to raise money, get weapons and spread propaganda. To coordinate these activities, the Tigers have established "branches" in at least 12 countries, including an office in the New York borough of Queens, prosecutors said in a complaint filed in U.S. District Court in Brooklyn. As director of the U.S. branch, Kandasamy oversaw the organization&#39;s activities and fund-raising, prosecutors said. Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/afp/20070604/bs_afp/airlinesectoriata Airline industry raises profit forecast, but debt weighs - Yahoo! News Airline industry raises profit forecast, but debt weighs 2 hours, 31 minutes ago VANCOUVER, Canada (AFP) - The world airline industry on Monday raised its profit forecast for this year to five billion dollars, from 3.8 billion dollars, but said the sector was languishing in debt. Giovanni Bisignani, director general of the International Air Transport Association, made the announcement in Vancouver at the opening of IATA&#39;s annual meeting. "While the results are encouraging, airlines are a 470-billion-dollar industry," he said. Calling a profit of five billion dollars "peanuts," Bisignani said the industry needed 40 billion dollars "just to cover the cost of capital." "The industry is moving in the right direction, but with 200 billion dollars of debt, the financial hole is deep. The challenge for is to turn peanuts into sustainable profits," he said. The latest financial forecasts for the sector confirmed a healthy recovery from the nosedive that followed the September 2001 attacks in the United States and soaring fuel prices, sinking the sector in more than 40 billion dollars in losses over the past six years. IATA already had sharply revised upward its 2007 estimate in April, from 2.5 billion dollars, as a relatively robust global economy spurred tourism and airline transport. IATA represents some 250 airlines which account for 94 percent of scheduled international air traffic. More than 150 airline chief executives as well as top management from airports, civil aviation authorities, manufacturers and non-governmental organizations are attending the three-day event, which ends Tuesday. Stocks eke out gain despite China drop Factory orders post weak advance Palm sells 25 percent stake Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Hyundai grabs lead in auto quality study Most Viewed - Business Ex-Enron executive sentenced to 2 years in prison 'Piggybacking' roils credit industry Oil at $70 as cyclone nears Mideast Gulf Krispy Kreme widens 1Q losses Loews bets on natural gas in $4 billion Dominion deal Middle-class America in peril CNN - Mon Jun 4, 1:37 PM ET Life after work: Sharing a legacy CNN - Fri Jun 1, 8:06 PM ET Save Money on Airfare! Jun 1, 7:38 PM ET May: a Great Month for Jobs Jun 1, 6:03 PM ET Online Currency Trading - Free Demo Free one-on-one training, award-winning software, & charts from GFT. Try Forex Currency Trading at Forex.com Free $50,000 practice account with real-time charts, news and research. Impress your customers, and your boss! Download a Free 30 Day Trial. An airplane is seen as it comes in for landing. The world airline industry... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Business - Airline/Airplane Industry &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Spotlight on cancer: Drugs, new studies China Goes Decadent With &#39;Millionaire Fair&#39; Dow Jones owners seen on the defensive Investors get nervous in China, and Murdoch makes nice. &raquo; Read Today's Column Get advice on how to manage the outcome of your income. &raquo; More from Yahoo! Finance Get the latest news, features and photos. . All rights reserved. The information contained in the AFP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of Agence France Presse.
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_as/philippines_terror_warning U.S. warns of terror in Philippine towns - Yahoo! News U.S. warns of terror in Philippine towns Sun Jun 3, 11:18 PM ET MANILA, Philippines - The U.S. Embassy in the Philippines has warned that terrorists may be planning to bomb bus terminals and public markets in two southern towns that have been targeted in the past. The attacks may take place in the coming days in the towns of Kidapawan and Makilala in North Cotabato province, 600 miles southeast of Manila, the embassy said in a statement posted on its Web site over the weekend. It called on U.S. citizens to "exercise extreme caution" in the island of Mindanao, where the North Cotabato province is located and which is home to a decades-old Muslim separatist rebellion and al-Qaida-linked militants. Seven people were killed and 44 wounded in bomb blasts in Kidapawan and two other southern towns in early January. In October, eight were killed and 22 wounded in an explosion in Makilala. Authorities blamed Muslim guerrillas with links to the Indonesia-based Jemaah Islamiyah network, whose operatives are believed to be training Filipino insurgents in bomb-making. Washington has provided money, equipment and military advisers to help Philippine troops battle the militants. Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Asia News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_la_am_ca/guantanamo_trials Yahoo! News ANDREW O. SELSKY, Associated Press Writer GUANTANAMO BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba - A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in , delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. The ruling raised questions about whether the U.S. would have to further revise procedures for prosecuting prisoners, leading to major delays. The chief of military defense attorneys at Guantanamo Bay argued that the ruling could spell the end of the war-crimes trial system set up last year by Congress and after the Supreme Court threw out the previous system. But a law professor said it appeared the judge left open the possibility of filing new charges. A military prosecutor said the ruling would be appealed, and the U.S. military entity responsible for holding the military trials said it believed Congress intended to grant jurisdiction to try suspected Taliban and al-Qaida members and supporters. Canadian detainee Omar Khadr, who was 15 when he was captured after a deadly firefight in Afghanistan and who is now 20, will remain at the remote U.S. military base along with some 380 other men suspected of links to al-Qaida and the Taliban. The judge, Army Col. Peter Brownback, said he had no choice but to throw out the Khadr case because he had been classified as an "enemy combatant" by a military panel years earlier &#151; and not as an "alien unlawful enemy combatant." The Military Commissions Act, signed by Bush last year, says only those classified as "unlawful" enemy combatants can face war trials here, Brownback noted during the arraignment in a hilltop courtroom. Later Monday, a lawyer representing the only other detainee charged with war crimes, Salim Ahmed Hamdan, asked another military judge to throw out that case, based on the Khadr ruling. The judge, Navy Capt. Keith Allred, called a recess before the prosecutor could make a statement. Marine Col. Dwight Sullivan, head of the Guantanamo defense attorneys, said the dismissal in the Khadr case would have "huge" impact because none of the detainees held at this isolated military base in southeast Cuba has been found to be an "unlawful" enemy combatant. "It is not just a technicality; it's the latest demonstration that this newest system just does not work," Sullivan told journalists. "It is a system of justice that does not comport with American values." Sullivan said that in order to reclassify the detainees as "unlawful" combatants, the whole review system would have to be overhauled, a time-consuming act. said the issue was little more than semantics. A spokesman said the system was not dealing with lawful combatants, who fight in uniform for a national army. It was set up to determine if a detainee acted as an "unlawful enemy combatant" who was not in an internationally recognized military, did not wear a uniform or rank insignia, did not carry arms openly and was not a party to the Geneva Conventions, he said. "It is our belief that the concept was implicit that all the Guantanamo detainees who were designated as `enemy combatants' ... were in fact unlawful," Navy Cmdr. Jeffrey Gordon told Tobias, a law professor at the University of Richmond, said that because Brownback dismissed the case without prejudice, the U.S. may be able to retry Khadr. He also said it is unclear whether all detainees would have to be reclassified. A military spokeswoman, Army Maj. Beth Kubala, said the prosecution had five days in which to file an appeal. But Sullivan said the court designated to hear any appeal &#151; known as the court of military commissions review &#151; doesn't even exist. Kubala told AP Television News that Brownback's ruling underscored the fairness of the system. "The military commissions procedures and rules are robust and grant significant rights to the accused," she said. The only other Guantanamo detainee currently charged with crimes is Hamdan, who is accused of chauffeuring and being the al-Qaida chief's bodyguard. The third detainee charged under the new system, Australian David Hicks, pleaded guilty in March to providing material support to al-Qaida and is serving a nine-month sentence in Australia. Brownback's ruling came just minutes into Khadr's arraignment on charges he committed murder in violation of the law of war, attempted murder in violation of the law of war, conspiracy, providing material support for terrorism and spying. Khadr allegedly killed a U.S. Army soldier with a grenade in the firefight, in which he was wounded. He appeared in the courtroom with a beard and wearing an olive-green prison uniform. "The charges are dismissed without prejudice," Brownback pronounced as he adjourned the proceeding. A prosecutor, Army Capt. Keith Petty, said he had been prepared to show Khadr was an unlawful combatant because he fought for al-Qaida, and videotapes showed Khadr making and planting explosives targeting American soldiers. Khadr seemed oblivious to the ruling. He calmly watched the judge throw out the case &#151; looking not at Brownback but at a computer screen at the defense table that showed a live TV broadcast of the proceedings. Khadr could see himself on the screen The U.S. military has hoped to accelerate its prosecutions of Guantanamo detainees, with the Pentagon saying it expects to eventually charge about 80 of the 380 prisoners held at this isolated base, but questions lingered about the legitimacy of the process. The Supreme Court, ruling in favor of a lawsuit brought by Hamdan, last June threw out a previous military tribunal system that was set up in the wake of the Sept. 11, 2001, attacks, calling it unconstitutional. Congress responded with new guidelines for war-crimes trials and Bush signed them into law. Hamdan's attorney, Navy Lt. Cmdr. Charles Swift, told The Associated Press that he will challenge the new system as unconstitutional. For example, the Military Commissions Act retroactively made certain acts, such as conspiracy a crime, Swift said. "This case raises significant questions" about the separation of powers, Swift said. "Congress cannot violate the Constitution to fix things ... but they are backdating anything and making it a crime." Hamdan is charged with conspiracy &#151; centered on his alleged membership in al-Qaida and purported role in plotting to attack civilians and civilian targets &#151; and with providing material support for terrorism. As part of the second charge, Hamdan is accused of transporting at least one SA-7 surface-to-air missile to shoot down U.S. and coalition military aircraft in Afghanistan in November 2001. The son of an alleged al-Qaida financier, Khadr is accused of killing U.S. Army Sgt. Christopher Speer with a grenade during a firefight in Afghanistan on July 27, 2002. Khadr's attorneys said he was a child soldier and should be rehabilitated, not imprisoned. "The U.S. will be the first country in modern history to try an individual who was a child at the time of the alleged war crimes," the attorneys said in a joint statement in April. Full Coverage: Guantanamo Detainees 30 minutes ago Judge&#39;s ruling may halt all Guantanamo trials Reuters, 36 minutes ago at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 at The Economist, Mar 30 Guantanamo Canadian case dropped at BBC, Jun 04 Detainee Found Dead in Guantnamo Cell at The New York Times (reg. req'd), May 31 at Boston Globe, May 03 Gitmo: still a 'legal black hole' at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), May 01 Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Bramble and Sibierski join Wigan on free transfers Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Russia warns U.S. about missile system Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 41 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Vonage - Official Site Talk all you want for just $24.99 per month & get 1 month free. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. In this courtroom sketch reviewed and cleared for release by U.S. Military officials, Guantanamo detainee... Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) World - AP Latin America Al-Qaida & Osama bin Laden &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/nm/20070603/india_nm/india301293 U.N. team to help Bangladesh tackle terrorism - Yahoo! News U.N. team to help Bangladesh tackle terrorism Sun Jun 3, 12:30 PM ET DHAKA (Reuters) - A team from the met officials at Bangladesh&#39;s foreign affairs and law ministries on Sunday to assess efforts by the army-backed interim government to tackle terrorism, especially by Islamist militants. The team will talk with officials, intelligence agencies and law enforcers and visit Chittagong port and an Islamic religious school (madrassa) during a week-long stay in Bangladesh. "The major goal of our visit is to make an assessment of the state of the current implementation by Bangladesh of Security Council resolution 1373, which was adopted after 9/11," the team&#39;s leader Sergey Karev told reporters after the meeting. "We will monitor not only legislation, but how Bangladesh cooperates with neighbours and rest of the world," said Karev, a director for assessment and technical assistance to the U.N. counter-terrorism committee. The team will also assess what technical assistance is needed, he said. Bangladesh, a moderate Muslim democracy of 140 million people, has suffered a series of bomb attacks by Islamists seeking to introduce sharia law. More than 30 people have been killed and over 150 wounded since August 2005, police say -- among them judges, lawyers and police officers. Hundreds of suspected militants from two outlawed groups, Jamaat-ul-Mujahideen and Jagrata Muslim Janata Bangladesh, have been detained under a counter-offensive launched in 2006. Six of the groups&#39; leaders were hanged in March after being tried by special courts, but security officials say their followers are regrouping under new names. One could be Zadid al-Qaeda, thought to be behind bomb blasts at railway stations in Chittagong, Dhaka and northeastern Sylhet last month. Radical leftists, mainly in its southwestern region, and armed tribal groups in the southeastern hill areas, have also committed violent acts. Foreign ministry officials said law enforcement agencies had launched sweeping operations to try and halt militant activity, while the government has strengthened rules against money laundering in a bid to disrupt the groups&#39; funding. Madrassas are often blamed for breeding militancy, but government officials said they had no clear evidence that Islamic religious schools are involved in terrorism. "After the visit, we are going to prepare a report, which will be approved by our counter-terrorism committee. Then, we will send the report to Bangladesh, with recommendations in order to work in the future," the U.N.&#39;s Karev said on Sunday. "Unfortunately, Bangladesh is the victim of terrorism and we will continue to work with Bangladesh." Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 42 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 Reuters Limited. All rights reserved. Republication or redistribution of Reuters content is expressly prohibited without the prior written consent of Reuters. Reuters shall not be liable for any errors or delays in the content, or for any actions taken in reliance thereon.
http://us.rd.yahoo.com/dailynews/rss/terrorism/*http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070604/ap_on_re_us/terrorism_plot Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot - Yahoo! News Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot By LARRY McSHANE, Associated Press Writer Mon Jun 4, 11:57 AM ET NEW YORK - Four men accused of plotting to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the city's busiest airport were so taken by an informant that they were sure God had sent him to them, authorities said. The informant made several overseas trips to discuss the plot against John F. Kennedy International Airport, even visiting a radical Muslim group's compound in Trinidad, officials said. He also joined the plotters on airport surveillance trips &#151; where authorities were waiting, they said. The suspects were convinced he was guided by a higher purpose: The ringleader believed the informant "had been sent by Allah to be the one" to pull off the bombing, according to a federal complaint. Authorities said the plot, revealed Saturday, demonstrated the growing importance of informants in efforts to combat terrorism, particularly as smaller radical groups become more aggressive. Accused mastermind Russell Defreitas, 63, is now in custody in New York, where he was due to have a bail hearing Wednesday. But two other suspects, Kareem Ibrahim and Abdul Kadir, a former member of Guyana's Parliament, were in Trinidad and will fight extradition to the United States, their lawyer, Rajid Persad, told a Trinidadian court Monday. The two made their initial court appearance there on one count each of conspiracy to commit a terrorist act against the government of the United States. The judge set a bail hearing for June 11 and an extradition hearing Aug. 2. Authorities in Trinidad are seeking a fourth suspect, Abdel Nur. Tom Corrigan, a former member of the -New York Police Department Joint Terrorism Task Force, said the Kennedy airport case and the recent plot to attack Fort Dix illustrated the need for inside information. Six men were arrested in a plot to attack soldiers at the New Jersey military base after an FBI informant infiltrated that group. "These have been two significant cases back-to-back where informants were used," Corrigan said. "These terrorists are in our own backyard. They may have to reach out to people they don't necessarily trust, but they need &#151; for guns, explosives, whatever." Without informants, Corrigan said, investigators are often left with little more than educated guesswork. "In most cases, you can't get from A to B without an informant," the ex-NYPD detective said. In the Kennedy airport case, the informant was a twice-convicted drug dealer who found himself in the midst of what investigators called a terrorist plot conceived as more devastating than the Sept. 11 attacks. "Would you like to die as a martyr?" the informant was asked, according to the indictment. He unhesitatingly replied yes and soon was making surveillance trips around the airport &#151; the "chicken farm," as the planners dubbed their target. Authorities said the JFK scheme was an example of homegrown terrorism. Defreitas, 63, immigrated to the U.S. more than 30 years ago, but he told the federal informant that his feelings of disgust toward his adopted homeland had lingered for years. "Before terrorism started in this country," he said in one secretly recorded conversation. Defreitas was arrested Friday night outside Brooklyn's Lindenwood Diner &#151; a spot once bugged by federal officials tracking former Gambino family boss John A. "Junior" Gotti. The four Muslim men accused in the JFK plot didn't turn to Pakistan, for support after targeting the airport, home to an average of 1,000 daily flights and 45 million passengers annually. Instead, according to a federal complaint, the informant, Ibrahim and Defreitas visited a compound belonging to Jamaat al Muslimeen, a radical Islamic group known for launching a bloody 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad that involved taking the prime minister and his Cabinet hostage. It left 24 people dead. Though Jamaat al Muslimeen did have contact with the men accused in the Kennedy airport plot, it is not accused of offering them any support. The group, whose followers are largely black converts to Sunni Islam, has faded as a political force in Trinidad as its leader, Yasin Abu Bakr, fends off criminal charges of inciting violence. The rebels in the 1990 raid on Parliament surrendered and were pardoned. When Defreitas discussed his radical "brothers" with the informant, he made it clear they were not Arabs, but from Trinidad and Guyana. The complaint made clear the informant had deeply infiltrated the group. Defreitas, a retired JFK airport cargo worker, made four reconnaissance missions to the airport, authorities said. They captured each one on audio and video equipment. Ibrahim and another suspect, Abdul Kadir, were in custody in Trinidad awaiting extradition hearings. Officials identified Kadir as a former mayor of a Guyanese town and a member of the country's Parliament. Associated Press Writers Tony Fraser in Port-of-Spain, Trinidad, and Pat Milton in New York contributed to this report. Full Coverage: Terrorism & 9/11 28 minutes ago 31 minutes ago One Had Stature and One Didn't, but Neither Seemed an Extremist at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 This terror plot was homegrown at Newsday, Jun 03 Hunt for fourth man in NY airport terror plot at The Guardian (UK)., Jun 04 The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 04 Terrorists, Chemicals and Trains at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 Break up the FBI at The Los Angeles Times (reg. req'd), Mar 21 Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Women prosecuted for smuggling children Dallas could elect its first gay mayor Court backs Mo. death penalty procedure Anti-war Marine blasts military Most Viewed - U.S. Vt. secession movement gains traction Parents of TB patient are 'in hell' Paris Hilton begins jail term a day early Public denied access to Calif. beaches Women prosecuted for smuggling children Raw video: golf cart driver busted for DUI AP - 56 minutes ago Plane Crashes Into California Homes minutes ago Metal Man Puts Mind Over Matter minutes ago Jury indicts Jefferson in bribery probe AP minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. Fuel tanks are seen at JFK International Airport in New York Sunday, June 3, ... JFK Airport Terror Plot Informant Helped Bust JFK Plot Investigators averted recent terror threat via outreach to Muslim community. &raquo; More ABC News video Drug convict helped bust JFK plot A convicted drug dealer secretly fed information to federal investigators, playing a key role in exposing a terrorism plot against JFK airport. (June 4) &raquo; More AP video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Lawyer with TB apparently not contagious Murder, Robbery Rates Up in Big Cities Personal histories shape immigration views PEOPLE OF THE WEB A convicted felon turns cameras on the cops. Yahoo! News "60 Minutes" He's a human calculator who sees numbers as shapes and colors. Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/s/ap/20070602/ap_on_re_mi_ea/iraq South and north, Iraqi Kurds squeezed - Yahoo! News South and north, Iraqi Kurds squeezed By CHARLES J. HANLEY, AP Special Correspondent Sat Jun 2, 6:08 PM ET BAGHDAD - From south and north, 's Kurdish region felt pressure from two sides Saturday, as saboteurs bombed a vital bridge link to Baghdad, and Turkish troops across the border massed for a possible strike. "We won't allow it to be turned into a battleground," Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki said Saturday of the relatively peaceful Iraqi north, a haven for anti-Turkish Kurdish guerrillas. Sectarian violence between Sunni and Shiite Muslims raged on in Iraq's center, meanwhile, as hours of mortar barrages killed eight people in a Sunni neighborhood of Baghdad that is surrounded by Shiites, and a prominent Sunni cleric was gunned down on the street. A series of explosions were heard in Baghdad late Saturday and state-run Iraqiya television reported that U.S. warplanes were bombarding Habibiyah, a Shiite area on edge of the Mahdi Army militia stronghold of Sadr City. The U.S. military, which has been searching for five British citizens in the area, said it was looking into the report. The U.S. casualty toll mounted for May, third-deadliest month for Americans in the four-year-old war: A soldier wounded in a roadside bomb blast in Baghdad last Wednesday was reported to have died of his wounds, raising the month's death toll to at least 127. Tensions have heightened in recent weeks in northern Iraq as Turkey has built up its military forces on Iraq's border, a move clearly meant to pressure Iraq to rein in the rebels of the Kurdistan Workers' Party, or PKK, separatists who launch raids into southeast Turkey's Kurdish region from hideouts in Iraq. Turkey's political and military leaders have been debating whether to try to root out those bases, and perhaps set up a buffer zone across the frontier as the Turkish army has done in the past. Turkey's military chief said Thursday the army was ready and only awaiting orders for a cross-border offensive. In an interview taped for broadcast Sunday on ABC-TV's "This Week," Iraq's Kurdish president, Jalal Talabani, said Iraqi leaders had convinced the Iraq-based militants to cease their attacks, "and they did it." Al-Maliki, the Shiite prime minister, ending a visit to the Kurdish north on Saturday, also sought to ease the growing tensions. "If there are some problems, we should not rely on weapons and threats, or use violence and power because this will increase tension and deepen problems," he told a news conference in the regional capital of Irbil. Some 90 miles to the south on Saturday, a bomb heavily damaged the Sarhat Bridge, a key crossing on a major road connecting Baghdad with Irbil, Sulaimaniya and other Kurdish cities of the north, police reported. The attack appeared to be the latest by insurgents who have tried to cripple vital Iraqi supply arteries, including Tigris River bridges in Baghdad. Small cars could still cross the damaged Sarhat span with difficulty, but trucks were being rerouted to a dangerous detour through areas of Diyala province among the most active in the anti-government, anti-U.S. insurgency, said police Brig. Sarhat Qadir. In farm fields about 40 miles to the northwest late Saturday, gunmen killed two Arab farmers and wounded six others, police in nearby Kirkuk reported. The attack may have reflected tensions between Iraq's majority Arabs and minority Kurds over future control of the Kirkuk area. The Baghdad mortar barrages slammed into Fadhil, a Sunni enclave in the Shiite-dominated eastern half of the city. The sporadic attacks began at 1:30 a.m. and lasted until 7 a.m., damaging five houses, killing eight people and wounding 25 others, police said. A policeman, speaking on condition of anonymity as he was not authorized to deal with the media, said a woman and child were among the dead. Sunni and Shiite districts frequently exchange mortar and other fire in Iraq's continuing sectarian conflict. In western Baghdad, a well-known Sunni cleric, Ali Khudir al-Zind, was killed in a drive-by shooting as he walked near his home, police said. Elsewhere in the city's western half, gunmen in two separate locations killed three people, and police found two bullet-riddled bodies of people who had been bound and blindfolded and showed signs of torture. North of Baghdad, a Sunni tribal sheik and village mayor, Rokan Mutlak al-Jibouri, whose tribe is said to be opposed to the activities of al-Qaida in Iraq, was shot to death while leaving his home for work Saturday morning, Brig. Qadir said. In all, at least 57 people were killed or found dead, including 26 bullet-riddled bodies that turned up on the streets of Baghdad bearing signs of torture &#151; apparent victims of so-called sectarian death squads usually run by Shiite militias. The growing enmity between foreign-influenced al-Qaida extremists and nationalist Sunni insurgents exploded into gunbattles Wednesday in the western Baghdad district of Amariyah. The area remained under curfew Saturday under the watch of U.S. and Iraqi troops. "I feel very comfortable when I see the American and the Iraqi troops because we are fed up with al-Qaida, which kept on threatening us and our businesses everyday," said Firas al-Azzawi, 32, owner of an electronics shop. "They were ordering us to close our shops because they were carrying out operations. They also have started killing Sunnis." Three missing US troops all killed: Iraq insurgents AFP, 48 minutes ago Iraq Qaeda group says killed captured U.S. troops Reuters, 49 minutes ago A teen's flight from Iraq at Christian Science Monitor, Jun 04 America's Iraq strategy boosts US combat losses The Christian Science Monitor via Yahoo! News, Jun 01 Missing US soldiers' IDs on video at BBC, Jun 04 Commanders Say Push in Baghdad Is Short of Goal at The New York Times (reg. req'd), Jun 04 The Hard Truth About Leaving Iraq RealClearPolitics via Yahoo! News, May 30 Looking back, the Iraq Study Group report is even worse than we thought at The Daily Star (Lebanon), May 23 Square survivors seek reform Putin attacks West ahead of G-8 summit Most Viewed - World suicide bomber dies in Somalia Musharraf tightens media regulations Bush heads to G8 Summit AP - 43 minutes ago Chinese energy plan reject caps on greenhouse gases CBC.ca - 1 hour, 42 minutes ago Video claims missing U.S. soldiers are dead AP minutes ago Judge in Guantanamo drops charges against Khadr CBC.ca minutes ago Mortgage Rates Fall Again $430,000 Loan $1299/mo. Think you pay too much? No SSN required. Don't Quit Your Job Take classes online and earn your degree in one year. Refinance with Bad Credit Compare up to 4 free quotes. Serious refinance requests only. An Iraqi man in a hospital in Kirkuk, Saturday, June 2, 2007 kisses a farmer... Iraqi Army Not Ready Until 2008 Iraqi president says U.S. troops need to help until the end of next year. &raquo; More ABC News video The enemy within Iraq&#39;s military CNN&#39;s Paula Hancocks reports on the fight to purge the Iraqi military of insurgents and militia. &raquo; More CNN video &raquo; Show all news video Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (About My Yahoo! and RSS) Middle East News - AP &raquo; More News Feeds Get an alert when there are new stories about: Elsewhere on the Web Missing word sees Gitmo charges dismissed European Protests as Bush Heads for G-8 Summit Diverse views on news from the right, left, and center Copyright &copy; 2007 rights reserved. The information contained in the AP News report may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed without the prior written authority of
http://news.yahoo.com/i/2807 Terrorism on Yahoo! News BAY NAVAL BASE, Cuba - A military judge dismissed terrorism-related charges Monday against a prisoner charged with killing an American soldier in Afghanistan, delivering a blow to the Bush administration's attempt to try Guantanamo detainees in military courts. Trinidad - The leader of a radical Trinidadian Muslim group denied Monday that his organization had any connection to four men accused of planning to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport. Suspected U.S. head of Tamil Tigers pleads innocent 2 hours, 1 minute ago NEW YORK (Reuters) - The suspected head of the U.S. branch of Sri Lanka&#39;s Tamil Tigers rebel group and four others pleaded not guilty on Monday to charges of assisting a foreign terrorist organization. JFK airport plot suspects appear in Trinidad court Mon Jun 4, 12:56 PM ET PORT OF SPAIN (Reuters) - Two suspects in a foiled plot to blow up New York&#39;s John F. Kennedy International Airport appeared in court in Trinidad and Tobago on Monday and were accused of conspiring to commit terrorism. Informant helped bust alleged JFK plot Mon Jun 4, 11:57 AM ET NEW YORK - Four men accused of plotting to bomb a fuel pipeline feeding the city's busiest airport were so taken by an informant that they were sure God had sent him to them, authorities said. Airline industry raises profit forecast, but debt weighs 2 hours, 31 minutes ago VANCOUVER, Canada (AFP) - The world airline industry on Monday raised its profit forecast for this year to five billion dollars, from 3.8 billion dollars, but said the sector was languishing in debt. Man jailed after false terror threat Mon Jun 4, 6:25 AM ET SINGAPORE - A Canadian man accused of making hoax calls to police claiming there was a terrorist onboard an Air India flight was sentenced to three years and eight months in prison by a Singapore court Monday. Analysis: Leadership in debate forefront Mon Jun 4, 9:31 AM ET MANCHESTER, N.H. - Questions of courage and political leadership emerged at the latest Democratic debate, as John Edwards forcefully challenged front-runners Hillary Rodham Clinton and Barack Obama over whether they had demonstrated leadership on key issues. U.S. warns of terror in Philippine towns Sun Jun 3, 11:18 PM ET MANILA, Philippines - The U.S. Embassy in the Philippines has warned that terrorists may be planning to bomb bus terminals and public markets in two southern towns that have been targeted in the past. Trinidad Islamic group under scrutiny Sun Jun 3, 8:52 PM ET PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - A radical Islamic group known for launching a bloody 1990 coup attempt in Trinidad faced growing scrutiny at home and abroad well before an alleged U.S. terrorist plot focused new attention on it. Brown promises tough new anti-terror measures Sun Jun 3, 1:01 PM ET LONDON (AFP) - Gordon Brown said Sunday he will propose giving police increased powers in questioning terror suspects when he becomes prime minister but promised to preserve Britain&#39;s cherished civil liberties. U.N. team to help Bangladesh tackle terrorism Sun Jun 3, 12:30 PM ET DHAKA (Reuters) - A team from the United Nations met officials at Bangladesh&#39;s foreign affairs and law ministries on Sunday to assess efforts by the army-backed interim government to tackle terrorism, especially by Islamist militants. Gordon Brown plans new anti-terror laws Sun Jun 3, 7:17 AM ET LONDON - Britain's incoming leader Gordon Brown will unveil a raft of new hardline anti-terrorism measures when he replaces Prime Minister Tony Blair later this month, British newspapers reported Sunday. Foiled US airport bomb plot was &#39;home-grown&#39; Sun Jun 3, 5:28 PM ET WASHINGTON (AFP) - A foiled plot to bomb New York&#39;s main international airport was a "home-grown" plan not directly linked to Al-Qaeda, though the militant Islamic network may have inspired it, a top US justice official said Sunday. Islamic suspects face charges in alleged terror plot in NY Sun Jun 3, 5:50 AM ET NEW YORK (AFP) - Four suspected Islamic extremists from South America and the Caribbean faced charges Sunday over an alleged terrorist plot to bomb fuel tanks and pipelines at John F. Kennedy Airport in New York. Trinidad holds 2 in alleged terror plot Sun Jun 3, 3:07 AM ET PORT-OF-SPAIN, Trinidad - Two men allegedly involved in a plot to attack New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport were in custody in Trinidad and Tobago on Saturday and the police commissioner said authorities were scouring the Caribbean country for a third suspect still at large. Terror threat first for pipeline firm Sat Jun 2, 8:19 PM ET NEW YORK - A foiled plot to blow up a jet fuel pipeline under John F. Kennedy International Airport drew attention to what counterterrorism experts have warned could be a key target. No bail for man in NYC terror gear case Sat Jun 2, 8:29 AM ET NEW YORK - A federal judge ordered a man held without bail while he awaits trial on charges that he provided al-Qaida fighters with equipment to attack U.S. soldiers. Gates considers roots of terrorism Sat Jun 2, 6:47 AM ET SINGAPORE - Declining to say whether the U.S. and its partners are winning the war on terror, Defense Secretary Robert Gates called Saturday for more focus on combating poverty and other underlying causes of extremism. South and north, Iraqi Kurds squeezed Sat Jun 2, 6:08 PM ET BAGHDAD - From south and north, Iraq's Kurdish region felt pressure from two sides Saturday, as saboteurs bombed a vital bridge link to Baghdad, and Turkish troops across the border massed for a possible strike. Padilla judge won't toss FBI wiretaps Fri Jun 1, 11:55 PM ET MIAMI - A federal judge refused Friday to toss out FBI wiretap evidence in the Jose Padilla terrorism support case, rejecting an attempt by defense attorneys to prevent jurors from hearing conversations about Osama bin Laden and other well-known Islamic extremist leaders. US adds new names to drug kingpin list Fri Jun 1, 7:29 PM ET WASHINGTON - The Bush administration on Friday named five foreign individuals and one Mexican entity to a list of suspected drug traffickers and those who trade in narcotics to help terrorists. U.S. terror expert says nuclear risk low Fri Jun 1, 6:10 AM ET SINGAPORE - Terrorists have little chance of obtaining enough fissile material to make a nuclear bomb, but governments must remain on guard against the possibility, a top U.S. expert said Friday. Fugitive TB patient apologizes to passengers Fri Jun 1, 10:24 AM ET WASHINGTON (Reuters) - A tuberculosis patient who turned fugitive to continue with wedding and honeymoon plans despite warnings not to travel apologized to the fellow airline passengers he may have endangered. Islamic terror groups using Swiss base: government Thu May 31, 8:28 AM ET ZURICH (Reuters) - Islamic militants are using Switzerland as a base because of its strategic location and different legal system from surrounding European Union countries, a government report published on Thursday said. New agency IARPA develops spy tools Thu May 31, 4:23 AM ET WASHINGTON - Using a new laptop and a satellite link, FBI agents can find out within two minutes whether the fingerprint from a newly captured suspect overseas matches a terrorist database in Virginia. Muslim nine deny terror charges in Australia Thu May 31, 2:09 AM ET SYDNEY (AFP) - Nine Muslim men detained in a series of police raids in 2005 pleaded not guilty Thursday to conspiring to commit a terrorist attack in Australia, at a hearing held under tight security. 9 terror suspects plead not guilty Thu May 31, 12:22 AM ET SYDNEY, Australia - Nine men accused of stockpiling bomb-making chemicals and plotting to avenge perceived injustices against Muslims pleaded not guilty to all charges Thursday in Australia's largest alleged terrorist conspiracy. Court upholds &#36;2.8M Iran terrorism claim Wed May 30, 10:07 PM ET SAN FRANCISCO - The brother of an Iranian terrorism victim can collect $2.8 million from a California company that owes Iran for a canceled weapons shipment, a federal appeals court ruled Wednesday. 20 suspects charged in Lebanon fighting Wed May 30, 9:39 PM ET BEIRUT, Lebanon - A military judge filed terrorism charges Wednesday against 20 suspected members of an Islamic militant group fighting Lebanese troops at a Palestinian refugee camp, court officials said. More in Yahoo! News U.S. News & World Report File photo shows security men guarding the China Eastern Airlines&#39; building in Shanghai. China Eastern... Osama bin Laden and al-Qaida &raquo; More Top Stories Photos Get the Untold Story Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone: Covering all of the world's conflicts. &raquo; Kevin Sites in the Hot Zone Freshen up your PC and make it look and run just like new. The latest Iraq news, analysis, photos, video and more. &raquo; More Iraq Coverage Add headlines to your personalized My Yahoo! page (Learn about My Yahoo! and RSS) &raquo; More News Feeds
